HFE mutations analysis in 711 hemochromatosis probands: evidence for S65C implication in mild form of hemochromatosis.
Hereditary hemochromatosis (HH) is a common autosomal recessive genetic disorder of iron metabolism. The HFE candidate gene encoding an HLA class I-like protein involved in HH was identified in 1996. Two missense mutations have been described  C282Y, accounting for 80% to 90% of HH chromosomes, and H63D, which is associated with a milder form of the disease representing 40% to 70% of non-C282Y HH chromosomes. We report here on the analysis of C282Y, H63D, and the 193A-- > T substitution leading to the S65C missense substitution in a large series of probands and controls. The results confirm that the C282Y substitution was the main mutation involved in hemochromatosis, accounting for 85% of carrier chromosomes, whereas the H63D substitution represented 39% of the HH chromosomes that did not carry the C282Y mutation. In addition, our screening showed that the S65C substitution was significantly enriched in probands with at least one chromosome without an assigned mutation. This substitution accounted for 7. 8% of HH chromosomes that were neither C282Y nor H63D. This enrichment of S65C among HH chromosomes suggests that the S65C substitution is associated with the mild form of hemochromatosis. 

autosomal recessive genetic disorder
The hereditary hemochromatosis protein, HFE, specifically regulates transferrin-mediated iron uptake in HeLa cells.
HFE is the protein product of the gene mutated in the autosomal recessive disease hereditary hemochromatosis (Feder, J. N., Gnirke, A., Thomas, W., Tsuchihashi, Z., Ruddy, D. A., Basava, A., Dormishian, F., Domingo, R. J., Ellis, M. C., Fullan, A., Hinton, L. M., Jones, N. L., Kimmel, B. E., Kronmal, G. S., Lauer, P., Lee, V. K., Loeb, D. B., Mapa, F. A., McClelland, E., Meyer, N. C., Mintier, G. A., Moeller, N., Moore, T., Morikang, E., Prasss, C. E ., Quintana, L., Starnes, S. M ., Schatzman, R. C ., Brunke, K. J ., Drayna, D. T., Risch, N. J ., Bacon, B. R ., and Wolff, R. R . (1996) Nat. Genet. 13, 399-408). At the cell surface, HFE complexes with transferrin receptor (TfR), increasing the dissociation constant of transferrin (Tf) for its receptor 10-fold (Gross, C. N ., Irrinki, A., Feder, J. N ., and Enns, C. A . (1998) J. Biol. Chem. 273, 22068-22074; Feder, J. N., Penny, D. M., Irrinki, A., Lee, V. K., Lebron, J. A., Watson, N., Tsuchihashi, Z., Sigal, E., Bjorkman, P. J., and Schatzman, R. C. (1998) Proc. Natl . Acad. Sci. U S A 95, 1472-1477). HFE does not remain at the cell surface, but traffics with TfR to Tf-positive internal compartments (Gross et al., 1998). Using a HeLa cell line in which the expression of HFE is controlled by tetracycline, we show that the expression of HFE reduces 55Fe uptake from Tf by 33% but does not affect the endocytic or exocytic rates of TfR cycling. Therefore, HFE appears to reduce cellular acquisition of iron from Tf within endocytic compartments. HFE specifically reduces iron uptake from Tf, as non-Tf-mediated iron uptake from Fe-nitrilotriacetic acid is not altered. These results explain the decreased ferritin levels seen in our HeLa cell system and demonstrate the specific control of HFE over the Tf-mediated pathway of iron uptake. These results also have implications for the understanding of cellular iron homeostasis in organs such as the liver, pancreas, heart, and spleen that are iron loaded in hereditary hemochromatotic individuals lacking functional HFE.

autosomal recessive disease
Mutation and haplotype studies of familial Mediterranean fever reveal new ancestral relationships and evidence for a high carrier frequency with reduced penetrance in the Ashkenazi Jewish population.
Familial Mediterranean fever (FMF) is a recessive disorder characterized by episodes of fever with serositis or synovitis. The FMF gene (MEFV) was cloned recently, and four missense mutations were identified. Here we present data from non-Ashkenazi Jewish and Arab patients in whom we had not originally found mutations and from a new, more ethnically diverse panel. Among 90 symptomatic mutation-positive individuals, 11 mutations accounted for 79% of carrier chromosomes. Of the two mutations that are novel, one alters the same residue (680) as a previously known mutation, and the other (P369S) is located in exon 3. Consistent with another recent report, the E148Q mutation was observed in patients of several ethnicities and on multiple microsatellite haplotypes, but haplotype data indicate an ancestral relationships between non-Jewish Italian and Ashkenazi Jewish patients with FMF and other affected populations. Among approximately 200 anonymous Ashkenazi Jewish DNA samples, the MEFV carrier frequency was 21%, with E148Q the most common mutation. Several lines of evidence indicate reduced penetrance among Ashkenazi Jews, especially for E148Q, P369S, and K695R. Nevertheless, E148Q helps account for recessive inheritance in an Ashkenazi family previously reported as an unusual case of dominantly inherited FMF. The presence of three frequent MEFV mutations in multiple Mediterranean populations strongly suggests a heterozygote advantage in this geographic region.

recessive disorder
Mutational analysis and genotype-phenotype correlation of 29 unrelated Japanese patients with X-linked adrenoleukodystrophy.
BACKGROUND  X-linked adrenoleukodystrophy (ALD) is an inherited disease characterized by progressive neurologic dysfunction, occasionally associated with adrenal insufficiency. The classic form of ALD usually has onset in childhood (childhood cerebral ALD), with rapid neurologic deterioration leading to a vegetative state. Adult-onset cerebral ALD also presents with rapidly progressive neurologic dysfunction. Milder phenotypes such as adrenomyeloneuropathy and Addison disease only also have been recognized. Despite discovery of the causative gene, a molecular basis for the diverse clinical presentations remains to be elucidated. OBJECTIVES  To conduct mutational analyses in 29 Japanese patients with ALD from 29 unrelated families, to obtain knowledge of the spectrum of mutations in this gene, and to study genotype-phenotype correlations in Japanese patients. METHODS  The 29 patients comprised 13 patients with childhood cerebral ALD, 11 patients with adult-onset cerebral ALD, and 5 patients with adrenomyeloneuropathy. We conducted detailed mutational analyses of 29 unrelated Japanese patients with ALD by genomic Southern blot analysis and direct nucleotide sequence analysis of reverse transcriptase-polymerase chain reaction products derived from total RNA that was extracted from cultured skin fibroblasts, lymphoblastoid cells, or peripheral blood leukocytes. RESULTS  Three patients with adult-onset cerebral ALD were identified as having large genomic rearrangements. The remaining 26 patients were identified as having 21 independent mutations, including 12 novel mutations resulting in small nucleotide alterations in the ALD gene. Eighteen (69%) of 26 mutations were missense mutations. Most missense mutations involved amino acids conserved in homologous gene products, including PMP70, mALDRP, and Pxa1p. The AG dinucleotide deletion at position 1081-1082, which has been reported previously to be the most common mutation in white patients (12% -17%), was also identified as the most common mutation in Japanese patients (12%). All phenotypes were associated with mutations resulting in protein truncation or subtle amino acid changes. There were no differences in phenotypic expressions between missense mutations involving conserved amino acids and those involving nonconserved amino acids. CONCLUSIONS  There are no obvious correlations between the phenotypes of patients with ALD and their genotypes, suggesting that other genetic or environmental factors modify the phenotypic expressions of ALD.. 

inherited disease
Genotype and phenotype in patients with dihydropyrimidine dehydrogenase deficiency.
Dihydropyrimidine dehydrogenase (DPD) deficiency is an autosomal recessive disease characterised by thymine-uraciluria in homozygous deficient patients and has been associated with a variable clinical phenotype. In order to understand the genetic and phenotypic basis for DPD deficiency, we have reviewed 17 families presenting 22 patients with complete deficiency of DPD. In this group of patients, 7 different mutations have been identified, including 2 deletions [295-298delTCAT, 1897delC], 1 splice-site mutation [IVS14 + 1G > A)] and 4 missense mutations (85T > C, 703C > T, 2658G > A, 2983G > T). Analysis of the prevalence of the various mutations among DPD patients has shown that the G-- > A point mutation in the invariant splice donor site is by far the most common (52%), whereas the other six mutations are less frequently observed. A large phenotypic variability has been observed, with convulsive disorders, motor retardation and mental retardation being the most abundant manifestations. A clear correlation between the genotype and phenotype has not been established. An altered beta-alanine, uracil and thymine homeostasis might underlie the various clinical abnormalities encountered in patients with DPD deficiency.

autosomal recessive disease
Type I human complement C2 deficiency. A 28-base pair gene deletion causes skipping of exon 6 during RNA splicing.
Two variants of a genetic deficiency of complement protein C2 (C2D) have been previously identified. No C2 protein translation is detected in type I deficiency, while type II deficiency is characterized by a selective block in C2 secretion. Type I C2 deficiency was described in a family in which the C2 null allele (C2Q0) is associated with the major histocompatibility haplotype/complotype HLA-A25, B18, C2Q0, BfS, C4A4, C4B2, Drw2; this extended haplotype occurs in over 90% of C2-deficient individuals (common complotype/haplotype). To determine the molecular basis of type I C2 deficiency, the C2 gene and cDNA were characterized from a homozygous type I C2-deficient individual with the common associated haplotype/complotype. We found a 28-base pair deletion in the type I C2Q0 gene, beginning 9 base pairs upstream of the 3-end of exon 6, that generates a C2 transcript with a complete deletion of exon 6 (134 base pair) and a premature termination codon. In studies of eight kindred, the 28-base pair deletion was observed in all C2Q0 alleles associated with the common type I deficient complotype/haplotype; this deletion was not present in normal C2 nor in type II C2-deficient genes. These data demonstrate that  1) type I human complement C2 deficiency is caused by a 28-base pair genomic deletion that causes skipping of exon 6 during RNA splicing, resulting in generation of a premature termination codon, 2) the 28-base pair deletion in the type I C2Q0 gene is strongly associated with the HLA haplotype/complotype A25, B18, C2Q0, BfS, C4A4, C4B2, Drw2, suggesting that all C2-deficient individuals with this haplotype/complotype will harbor the 28-base pair C2 gene deletion, and 3) type II C2 deficiency is caused by a different, as yet uncharacterized, molecular genetic defect.. 

genetic defect
Assignment of the human Na+/glucose cotransporter gene SGLT1 to chromosome 22q13.1.
The Na +/glucose cotransporter gene SGLT1 encodes the primary carrier protein responsible for the uptake of the dietary sugars glucose and galactose from the intestinal lumen. SGLT1 transport activity is currently exploited in oral rehydration therapy. The 75-kDa glycoprotein is localized in the brush border of the intestinal epithelium and is predicted to comprise 12 membrane spans. In two patients with the autosomal recessive disease glucose/galactose malabsorption, the underlying cause was found to be a missense mutation in SGLT1, and the Asp28-- > Asn change was demonstrated in vitro to eliminate SGLT1 transport activity. The SGLT1 gene was previously shown to reside on the distal q arm of chromosome 22 (11. 2-- > qter). We have used a cosmid probe for fluorescence in situ hybridization, which refines the localization to 22q13. 1, and provide an example of the utility of the SGLT1 probe as a diagnostic for genetic diseases associated with translocations of chromosome 22.

genetic diseases
French Machado-Joseph disease patients do not exhibit gametic segregation distortion: a sperm typing analysis.
Segregation distortion has been reported to occur in a number of the trinucleotide repeat disorders. On the basis of a sperm typing study performed in patients of Japanese descent with Machado-Joseph disease (MJD), it was reported that disease alleles are preferentially transmitted during meiosis. We performed a sperm typing study of five MJD patients of French descent and analysis of the pooled data shows a ratio of mutant to normal alleles of 379  436 (46. 5  53. 5%), which does not support meiotic segregation distortion. To confirm these results, sperm typing analysis was also performed using a polymorphic marker, D14S1050, closely linked to the MJD1 gene. Among 910 sperm analyzed, the allele linked to the disease chromosome was detected in 50. 3% of the samples and the allele linked to the normal chromosome was found in 49. 6% of the sperm. The difference in frequency of these two alleles is not significant (P = 0. 8423). Likelihood-based analysis of segregation distortion in the single sperm data using the SPERMSEG program also showed no support for segregation distortion at the gamete level in this patient population. The previous report on the Japanese patients also suggested that disease allele stability may be influenced by a trans effect of an intragenic polymorphism (987 G/C) in the wild-type allele. All of the French patients were heterozygous for this polymorphism. However, analysis of the variance in repeat number in sperm from the French MJD patients overlapped significantly with the variance in repeat number observed in the C/C homozygous Japanese patients.

trinucleotide repeat disorders
The human gene for alkaptonuria (AKU) maps to chromosome 3q.
Alkaptonuria (AKU; McKusick no. 203500) is a rare autosomal recessive disorder caused by the lack of homogentisic acid oxidase activity. Patients excrete large amounts of homogentisic acid in their urine and a black ochronotic pigment is deposited in their cartilage and collagenous tissues. Ochronosis is the predominant clinical complication of the disease leading to ochronotic arthropathy, dark urine, pigment changes of the skin, and other clinical features. A mutation causing alkaptonuria in the mouse has mapped to chromosome 16. Considering conserved synteny, we were able to map the human gene to chromosome 3q in six alkaptonuria pedigrees of Slovak origin.. 

autosomal recessive disorder
Additional copies of the proteolipid protein gene causing Pelizaeus-Merzbacher disease arise by separate integration into the X chromosome.
The proteolipid protein gene (PLP) is normally present at chromosome Xq22. Mutations and duplications of this gene are associated with Pelizaeus-Merzbacher disease (PMD). Here we describe two new families in which males affected with PMD were found to have a copy of PLP on the short arm of the X chromosome, in addition to a normal copy on Xq22. In the first family, the extra copy was first detected by the presence of heterozygosity of the AhaII dimorphism within the PLP gene. The results of FISH analysis showed an additional copy of PLP in Xp22. 1, although no chromosomal rearrangements could be detected by standard karyotype analysis. Another three affected males from the family had similar findings. In a second unrelated family with signs of PMD, cytogenetic analysis showed a pericentric inversion of the X chromosome. In the inv (X) carried by several affected family members, FISH showed PLP signals at Xp11. 4 and Xq22. A third family has previously been reported, in which affected members had an extra copy of the PLP gene detected at Xq26 in a chromosome with an otherwise normal banding pattern. The identification of three separate families in which PLP is duplicated at a noncontiguous site suggests that such duplications could be a relatively common but previously undetected cause of genetic disorders.

genetic disorders
Mice deficient in Six5 develop cataracts: implications for myotonic dystrophy.
Expansion of a CTG trinucleotide repeat in the 3 UTR of the gene DMPK at the DM1 locus on chromosome 19 causes myotonic dystrophy, a dominantly inherited disease characterized by skeletal muscle dystrophy and myotonia, cataracts and cardiac conduction defects. Targeted deletion of Dm15, the mouse orthologue of human DMPK, produced mice with a mild myopathy and cardiac conduction abnormalities, but without other features of myotonic dystrophy, such as myotonia and cataracts. We, and others, have demonstrated that repeat expansion decreases expression of the adjacent gene SIX5 (refs 7, 8), which encodes a homeodomain transcription factor. To determine whether SIX5 deficiency contributes to the myotonic dystrophy phenotype, we disrupted mouse Six5 by replacing the first exon with a beta-galactosidase reporter. Six5-mutant mice showed reporter expression in multiple tissues, including the developing lens. Homozygous mutant mice had no apparent abnormalities of skeletal muscle function, but developed lenticular opacities at a higher rate than controls. Our results suggest that SIX5 deficiency contributes to the cataract phenotype in myotonic dystrophy, and that myotonic dystrophy represents a multigenic disorder.. 

deficient in Six5
dominantly inherited disease
SIX5 deficiency
SIX5 deficiency
multigenic disorder
Isolation, genomic organization, and expression analysis of the mouse and rat homologs of MEFV, the gene for familial mediterranean fever.
Familial Mediterranean fever (FMF) is a recessive disorder characterized by episodes of fever with serositis or synovitis. Recently the FMF gene (MEFV) was cloned; the protein product, pyrin/marenostrin, is thought to regulate inflammation in myeloid cells. In this manuscript we report the mouse and rat homologs of MEFV. The murine gene contains ten exons with a coding sequence of 2304 bp, while the rat homolog has nine exons with a coding sequence of 2253 bp. A considerable amino acid sequence homology was observed between the mouse and human (47. 6% identity and 65. 5% similarity) and between the mouse and rat genes (73. 5% identity and 82. 1% similarity). The predicted rodent proteins have several important domains and signals found in human pyrin, including a B-box zinc finger domain, Robbins-Dingwall nuclear localization signal, and coiled-coil domain. However, perhaps because of an ancient frame-shift mutation, neither the mouse nor the rat protein has an intact C-terminal B30. 2 domain, in which most FMF-associated mutations have been found in human MEFV. Nevertheless, like the human gene, mouse Mefv is expressed in peripheral blood granulocytes but not lymphocytes. Consistent with its expression in granulocytes, Mefv was detected at high levels in the primary follicles and marginal zones of the splenic white pulp. Mefv is localized on mouse Chromosome (Chr) 16, region A3-B1, extending a region of synteny with human Chr 16p13. 3. Development of knockout and knockin mouse models may provide further insights into the functional evolution of this gene. 

recessive disorder
Ataxin-3 with an altered conformation that exposes the polyglutamine domain is associated with the nuclear matrix.
Spinocerebellar ataxia type-3 or Machado-Joseph disease (SCA3/MJD) is a member of the CAG/polyglutamine repeat disease family. In this family of disorders, a normally polymorphic CAG repeat becomes expanded, resulting in expression of an expanded polyglutamine domain in the disease gene product. Experimental models of polyglutamine disease implicate the nucleus in pathogenesis; however, the link between intranuclear expression of expanded polyglutamine and neuronal dysfunction remains unclear. Here we demonstrate that ataxin-3, the disease protein in SCA3/MJD, adopts a unique conformation when expressed within the nucleus of transfected cells. The monoclonal antibody 1C2 is known preferentially to bind expanded polyglutamine, but we find that it also binds a fragment of ataxin-3 containing a normal glutamine repeat. In addition, expression of ataxin-3 within the nucleus exposes the glutamine domain of the full-length non-pathological protein, allowing it to bind the monoclonal antibody 1C2. Fractionation and immunochemical experiments indicate that this novel conformation of intranuclear ataxin-3 is not due to proteolysis, suggesting instead that association with nuclear protein (s) alters the structure of full-length ataxin-3 which exposes the polyglutamine domain. This conformationally altered ataxin-3 is bound to the nuclear matrix. The pathological form of ataxin-3 with an expanded polyglutamine domain also associates with the nuclear matrix. These data suggest that an early event in the pathogenesis of SCA3/MJD may be an altered conformation of ataxin-3 within the nucleus that exposes the polyglutamine domain.. 

CAG/polyglutamine repeat disease
polyglutamine disease
A zinc finger truncation of murine WT1 results in the characteristic urogenital abnormalities of Denys-Drash syndrome .
The Wilms tumor -suppressor gene, WT1, plays a key role in urogenital development, and WT1 dysfunction is implicated in both neoplastic (Wilms tumor, mesothelioma, leukemias, and breast cancer) and nonneoplastic (glomerulosclerosis) disease. The analysis of diseases linked specifically with WT1 mutations, such as Denys-Drash syndrome (DDS), can provide valuable insight concerning the role of WT1 in development and disease. DDS is a rare childhood disease characterized by a nephropathy involving mesangial sclerosis, XY pseudohermaphroditism, and/or Wilms tumor (WT). DDS patients are constitutionally heterozygous for exonic point mutations in WT1, which include mutations predicted to truncate the protein within the C-terminal zinc finger (ZF) region. We report that heterozygosity for a targeted murine Wt1 allele, Wt1 (tmT396), which truncates ZF3 at codon 396, induces mesangial sclerosis characteristic of DDS in adult heterozygous and chimeric mice. Male genital defects also were evident and there was a single case of Wilms tumor in which the transcript of the nontargeted allele showed an exon 9 skipping event, implying a causal link between Wt1 dysfunction and Wilms tumorigenesis in mice. However, the mutant WT1 (tmT396) protein accounted for only 5% of WT1 in both heterozygous embryonic stem cells and the WT. This has implications regarding the mechanism by which the mutant allele exerts its effect.

WT1 dysfunction
Wt1 dysfunction
ATM-heterozygous germline mutations contribute to breast cancer-susceptibility.
Approximately 0. 5% -1% of the general population has been estimated to be heterozygous for a germline mutation in the ATM gene. Mutations in the ATM gene are responsible for the autosomal recessive disorder ataxia-telangiectasia (A-T) (MIM 208900). The finding that ATM-heterozygotes have an increased relative risk for breast cancer was supported by some studies but not confirmed by others. In view of this discrepancy, we examined the frequency of ATM germline mutations in a selected group of Dutch patients with breast cancer. We have analyzed ATM germline mutations in normal blood lymphocytes, using the protein-truncation test followed by genomic-sequence analysis. A high percentage of ATM germline mutations was demonstrated among patients with sporadic breast cancer. The 82 patients included in this study had developed breast cancer at age < 45 and had survived >/= 5 years (mean 15 years), and in 33 (40%) of the patients a contralateral breast tumor had been diagnosed. Among these patients we identified seven (8. 5%) ATM germline mutations, of which five are distinct. One splice-site mutation (IVS10-6T-- > G) was detected three times in our series. Four heterozygous carriers were patients with bilateral breast cancer. Our results indicate that the mutations identified in this study are " A-T disease-causing " mutations that might be associated with an increased risk of breast cancer in heterozygotes. We conclude that ATM heterozygotes have an approximately ninefold-increased risk of developing a type of breast cancer characterized by frequent bilateral occurrence, early age at onset, and long-term survival. The specific characteristics of our population of patients may explain why such a high frequency was not found in other series. 

autosomal recessive disorder
Constitutive and regulated modes of splicing produce six major myotonic dystrophy protein kinase (DMPK) isoforms with distinct properties.
Myotonic dystrophy (DM) is the most prevalent inherited neuromuscular disease in adults. The genetic defect is a CTG triplet repeat expansion in the 3-untranslated region of the myotonic dystrophy protein kinase (DMPK) gene, consisting of 15 exons. Using a transgenic DMPK-overexpressor mouse model, we demonstrate here that the endogenous mouse DMPK gene and the human DMPK transgene produce six major alternatively spliced mRNAs which have almost identical cell type-dependent distribution frequencies and expression patterns. Use of a cryptic 5 splice site in exon 8, which results in absence or presence of 15 nucleotides specifying a VSGGG peptide motif, and/or use of a cryptic 3 splice site in exon 14, which leads to a frameshift in the mRNA reading frame, occur as independent stochastic events in all tissues examined. In contrast, the excision of exons 13/14 that causes a frameshift and creates a C-terminally truncated protein is clearly cell type dependent and occurs predominantly in smooth muscle. We generated all six full-length mouse cDNAs that result from combinations of these three major splicing events and show that their transfection into cells in culture leads to production of four different approximately 74 kDa full-length (heart-, skeletal muscle- or brain-specific) and two C-terminally truncated approximately 68 kDa (smooth muscle-specific) isoforms. Information on DMPK mRNA and protein isoform expression patterns will be useful for recognizing differential effects of (CTG) (n) expansion in DM manifestation.. 

inherited neuromuscular disease
genetic defect
Diverse point mutations in the human glucose-6-phosphate dehydrogenase gene cause enzyme deficiency and mild or severe hemolytic anemia.
Glucose-6-phosphate dehydrogenase (G6PD; EC 1. 1. 1. 49) deficiency is a common genetic abnormality affecting an estimated 400 million people worldwide. Clinical and biochemical analyses have identified many variants exhibiting a range of phenotypes, which have been well characterized from the hematological point of view. However, until now, their precise molecular basis has remained unknown. We have cloned and sequenced seven mutant G6PD alleles. In the nondeficient polymorphic African variant G6PD A we have found a single point mutation. The other six mutants investigated were all associated with enzyme deficiency. In one of the commonest, G6PD Mediterranean, which is associated with favism among other clinical manifestations, a single amino acid replacement was found (serine----phenylalanine)  it must be responsible for the decreased stability and the reduced catalytic efficiency of this enzyme. Single point mutations were also found in G6PD Metaponto (Southern Italy) and in G6PD Ilesha (Nigeria), which are asymptomatic, and in G6PD Chatham, which was observed in an Indian boy with neonatal jaundice. In G6PD " Matera, " which is now known to be the same as G6PD A-, two separate point mutations were found, one of which is the same as in G6PD A. In G6PD Santiago, a de novo mutation (glycine----arginine) is associated with severe chronic hemolytic anemia. The mutations observed show a striking predominance of C----T transitions, with CG doublets involved in four of seven cases. Thus, diverse point mutations may account largely for the phenotypic heterogeneity of G6PD deficiency. 

genetic abnormality
X-linked retinoschisis with point mutations in the XLRS1 gene.
BACKGROUND  X-linked retinoschisis (XLRS) is a relatively rare vitreoretinal dystrophy that causes visual loss in young men. Recently, a gene responsible for this disease, designated XLRS1, was identified, and several deleterious gene mutations were reported. OBJECTIVE  To analyze Japanese patients clinically diagnosed as having XLRS formutational changes in the XLRS1 gene. METHODS  Ten patients with XLRS underwent full ophthalmologic examination, including slitlamp biomicroscopy and dilated funduscopy. Genomic DNA was isolated from leukocytes, and all exons of the XLRS1 gene were amplified by polymerase chain reaction and analyzed using a direct sequencing method. RESULTS  Point mutations in the XLRS1 gene were identified in all 10 patients. The mutations were identical in each of 2 pairs of brothers. Six of the point mutations represented missense mutations, 1 was a nonsense mutation, and 1 was a frameshift mutation. Five of the mutations are newly reported herein. CONCLUSIONS  The discovery of new point mutations in this study increases the available information regarding the spectrum of genetic abnormalities and clinical manifestations of XLRS. However, the limited data failed to reveal a correlation between mutation and disease phenotype. CLINICAL RELEVANCE  Identification of mutations in the XLRS1 gene and expanded information on clinical manifestations will facilitate early diagnosis, appropriate early therapy, and genetic counseling regarding the prognosis of XLRS.. 

genetic abnormalities
Uncoupling of hypomyelination and glial cell death by a mutation in the proteolipid protein gene.
Proteolipid protein (PLP; M (r) 30, 000) is a highly conserved major polytopic membrane protein in myelin but its cellular function remains obscure. Neurological mutant mice can often provide model systems for human genetic disorders . Mutations of the X-chromosome-linked PLP gene are lethal, identified first in the jimpy mouse and subsequently in patients with Pelizaeus-Merzbacher disease. The unexplained phenotype of these mutations includes degeneration and premature cell death of oligodendrocytes with associated hypomyelination. Here we show that a new mouse mutant rumpshaker is defined by the amino-acid substitution Ile-to-Thr at residue 186 in a membrane-embedded domain of PLP. Surprisingly, rumpshaker mice, although myelin-deficient, have normal longevity and a full complement of morphologically normal oligodendrocytes. Hypomyelination can thus be genetically separated from the PLP-dependent oligodendrocyte degeneration. We suggest that PLP has a vital function in glial cell development, distinct from its later role in myelin assembly, and that this dichotomy of action may explain the clinical spectrum of Pelizaeus-Merzbacher disease.. 

genetic disorders
Autosomal recessive familial neurohypophyseal diabetes insipidus with continued secretion of mutant weakly active vasopressin.
Familial neurohypophyseal diabetes insipidus is an autosomal dominant disorder characterized by post-natal development of arginine vasopressin (AVP) deficiency due to mutations in the AVP gene. All published mutations affect the signal peptide or the neurophysin-II carrier protein and are presumed to interfere with processing of the preprohormone, leading to neuronal damage. We studied an unusual Palestinian family consisting of asymptomatic first cousin parents and three children affected with neurohypophyseal diabetes insipidus, suggesting autosomal recessive inheritance. All three affected children were homozygous and the parents heterozygous for a single novel mutation (C301- > T) in exon 1, replacing Pro7 of mature AVP with Leu (Leu-AVP). Leu-AVP was a weak agonist with approximately 30-fold reduced binding to the human V2 receptor. Measured by radioimmunoassay with a synthetic Leu-AVP standard, serum Leu-AVP levels were elevated in all three children and further increased during water deprivation to as high as 30 times normal. The youngest child (2 years old) was only mildly affected but had Leu-AVP levels similar to her severely affected 8-year-old brother, suggesting that unknown mechanisms may partially compensate for a deficiency of active AVP in very young children.. 

autosomal dominant disorder
Knobloch syndrome involving midline scalp defect of the frontal region.
We report on a 4-year-old boy with Knobloch syndrome. He has vitreoretinal degeneration, high myopia, cataract, telecanthus, hypertelorism, and a high-arched palate. He also has a defect of the anterior midline scalp with involvement of the frontal bone as documented by a computed tomography (CT) scan. The brain was normal on CT scan and magnetic resonance imaging. We present a review of the 23 published cases with this syndrome. Our patient illustrates the importance of investigating for underlying ocular and central nervous system pathology whenever midline scalp defects are present.. 

telecanthus
Pendred syndrome: phenotypic variability in two families carrying the same PDS missense mutation.
Pendred syndrome comprises congenital sensorineural hearing loss, thyroid goiter, and positive perchlorate discharge test. Recently, this autosomal recessive disorder was shown to be caused by mutations in the PDS gene, which encodes an anion transporter called pendrin. Molecular analysis of the PDS gene was performed in two consanguineous large families from Southern Tunisia comprising a total of 23 individuals affected with profound congenital deafness; the same missense mutation, L445W, was identified in all affected individuals. A widened vestibular aqueduct was found in all patients who underwent computed tomography (CT) scan exploration of the inner ear. In contrast, goiter was present in only 11 affected individuals, who interestingly had a normal result of the perchlorate discharge test whenever performed. The present results question the sensitivity of the perchlorate test for the diagnosis of Pendred syndrome and support the use of a molecular analysis of the PDS gene in the assessment of individuals with severe to profound congenital hearing loss associated with inner ear morphological anomaly even in the absence of a thyroid goiter.. 

autosomal recessive disorder
Hereditary TP53 codon 292 and somatic P16INK4A codon 94 mutations in a Li-Fraumeni syndrome family.
Li-Fraumeni syndrome is an autosomal dominant disorder that is characterized by various types of cancer in childhood and adult cases. Although hereditary TP53 mutation is very rare in different human cancers, it has been frequently reported in Li-Fraumeni syndrome. On the other hand, hereditary mutations of TP57KIP2, P15INK4B, and P16INK4A, which affect the cell cycle similar to TP53, were observed in some types of cancer. In a Turkish family with the diagnosis of Li-Fraumeni syndrome, we analyzed the mutation pattern of TP53, P57KIP2, P15INK4B, and P16INK4A in the peripheral blood, and loss of heterozygosity (homo/hemizygous deletion) pattern of TP53 and P15INK4B/P16INK4A in two tumor tissues. The propositus had a seminoma, his daughter a medulloblastoma, and one of his healthy cousins, a TP53 codon 292 missense point mutation (AAA-- > ATA; Lys-- > Ile) in the peripheral blood cells. Tumor tissue obtained from the propositus with the seminoma revealed loss of heterozygosity in the TP53 gene. In the analyses of tumor tissues from the propositus and his daughter, a P16INK4A codon 94 missense point mutation (GCG-- > GAG; Ala-- > Glu) was observed with the hereditary TP53 mutation. P16INK4A codon 94 mutation observed in our family is a novel mutation in Li-Fraumeni syndrome. No other gene alteration in TP53, P57KIP2, P15INK4B, and P16INK4A was observed. Existence of the P16INK4A mutation and the hereditary TP53 mutation with or without loss of heterozygosity in the TP53 gene (seminoma/medulloblastoma) may be evidence for a common mechanism involved in tumorogenesis. The gene alterations in TP53 and P16INK4A genes may be used as tumor markers in our family.. 

autosomal dominant disorder
An amino-acid substitution involved in phenylketonuria is in linkage disequilibrium with DNA haplotype 2.
Phenylketonuria (PKU) is an autosomal recessive human genetic disorder caused by a deficiency of hepatic phenylalanine hydroxylase (PAH, phenylalanine 4-monooxygenase, EC 1. 14. 16. 1). PKU is a common inborn error of amino-acid metabolism in caucasian populations and approximately 1 in 50 individuals are carriers of a PKU allele. To define the molecular basis of PKU, we characterized twelve restriction fragment-length polymorphism (RFLP) haplotypes of the PAH locus in the northern European population and observed that 90% of the PKU alleles in this population are confined to four common RFLP haplotypes. We have recently reported a splicing mutation in the PAH gene that is associated with RFLP haplotype 3 which is present at about 40% of mutant alleles. We now report the molecular lesion associated with the RFLP haplotype 2 mutant allele. This defect is caused by a C-to-T transition in exon 12 resulting in an amino-acid substitution (Arg to Trp) at residue 408 of PAH. Direct hybridization analysis of the point mutation using a specific oligonucleotide probe demonstrated that this mutation is also in linkage disequilibrium with RFLP haplotype 2 alleles that make up about 20% of mutant PAH genes 

autosomal recessive human genetic disorder
molecular lesion
Somatic mutations in the BRCA1 gene in sporadic ovarian tumours.
The BRCA1 gene on chromosome 17q21 is responsible for an autosomal dominant syndrome of increased susceptibility to breast and ovarian cancer but no somatic mutations in tumours have yet been described. To study the potential role of BRCA1 in sporadic carcinogenesis, we analysed the genomic DNA of tumour and normal fractions of 47 ovarian cancers for mutations in BRCA1 using the single-strand conformation polymorphism technique. We now describe somatic mutations in the DNA of four tumours which also had loss of heterozygosity (LOH) at a BRCA1 intragenic marker. Our data support a tumour suppressor mechanism for BRCA1; somatic mutations and LOH may result in inactivation of BRCA1 in at least a small number of ovarian cancers.. 

autosomal dominant syndrome
Iron-dependent self-assembly of recombinant yeast frataxin: implications for Friedreich ataxia.
Frataxin deficiency is the primary cause of Friedreich ataxia (FRDA), an autosomal recessive cardiodegenerative and neurodegenerative disease. Frataxin is a nuclear-encoded mitochondrial protein that is widely conserved among eukaryotes. Genetic inactivation of the yeast frataxin homologue (Yfh1p) results in mitochondrial iron accumulation and hypersensitivity to oxidative stress. Increased iron deposition and evidence of oxidative damage have also been observed in cardiac tissue and cultured fibroblasts from patients with FRDA. These findings indicate that frataxin is essential for mitochondrial iron homeostasis and protection from iron-induced formation of free radicals. The functional mechanism of frataxin, however, is still unknown. We have expressed the mature form of Yfh1p (mYfh1p) in Escherichia coli and have analyzed its function in vitro. Isolated mYfh1p is a soluble monomer (13, 783 Da) that contains no iron and shows no significant tendency to self-associate. Aerobic addition of ferrous iron to mYfh1p results in assembly of regular spherical multimers with a molecular mass of approximately 1. 1 MDa (megadaltons) and a diameter of 13 +/-2 nm. Each multimer consists of approximately 60 subunits and can sequester > 3, 000 atoms of iron. Titration of mYfh1p with increasing iron concentrations supports a stepwise mechanism of multimer assembly. Sequential addition of an iron chelator and a reducing agent results in quantitative iron release with concomitant disassembly of the multimer, indicating that mYfh1p sequesters iron in an available form. In yeast mitochondria, native mYfh1p exists as monomer and a higher-order species with a molecular weight > 600, 000. After addition of (55) Fe to the medium, immunoprecipitates of this species contain > 16 atoms of (55) Fe per molecule of mYfh1p. We propose that iron-dependent self-assembly of recombinant mYfh1p reflects a physiological role for frataxin in mitochondrial iron sequestration and bioavailability.. 

autosomal recessive cardiodegenerative and neurodegenerative disease
Adrenoleukodystrophy-related protein can compensate functionally for adrenoleukodystrophy protein deficiency (X-ALD): implications for therapy.
Inherited defects in the peroxisomal ATP-binding cassette (ABC) transporter adrenoleukodystrophy protein (ALDP) lead to the lethal peroxisomal disorder X-linked adrenoleukodystrophy (X-ALD), for which no efficient treatment has been established so far. Three other peroxisomal ABC transporters currently are known  adrenoleukodystrophy-related protein (ALDRP), 70 kDa peroxisomal membrane protein (PMP70) and PMP70- related protein. By using transient and stable overexpression of human cDNAs encoding ALDP and its closest relative ALDRP, we could restore the impaired peroxisomal beta-oxidation in fibroblasts of X-ALD patients. The pathognomonic accumulation of very long chain fatty acids could also be prevented by overexpression of ALDRP in immortalized X-ALD cells. Immunofluorescence analysis demonstrated that the functional replacement of ALDP by ALDRP was not due to stabilization of the mutated ALDP itself. Moreover, we were able to restore the peroxisomal beta-oxidation defect in the liver of ALDP-deficient mice by stimulation of ALDRP and PMP70 gene expression through a dietary treatment with the peroxisome proliferator fenofibrate. These results suggest that a correction of the biochemical defect in X-ALD could be possible by drug-induced overexpression or ectopic expression of ALDRP.. 

Inherited defects
Recessively inherited multiple epiphyseal dysplasia with normal stature, club foot, and double layered patella caused by a DTDST mutation.
We have observed over 25 different mutations in the diastrophic dysplasia sulphate transporter gene (DTDST) in association with the recessive disorders achondrogenesis 1B, atelosteogenesis 2, and diastrophic dysplasia. The c862t (R279W) transition is the most common mutation in non-Finnish patients, but in these disorders it is usually combined with other DTDST mutations. We had not seen a case of homozygosity for c862t (R279W) until we analysed DNA from a 36 year old male with tall-normal stature (180 cm) who asked for genetic counselling for suspected multiple epiphyseal dysplasia. He was treated for club foot and hip dysplasia at birth. Skeletal changes consistent with multiple epiphyseal dysplasia, with the peculiar finding of a double layered patella, were recognised during childhood. Cleft palate, swelling of the ear pinna, and hitch hiker thumb were absent. He was found to be homozygous, and both healthy parents heterozygous, for the R279W mutation in DTDST, and his fibroblasts showed a sulphate incorporation defect typical of DTDST disorders. Counselling was given for a recessive disorder, thereby considerably reducing the probability of affected offspring. Multiple epiphyseal dysplasia is more frequently caused by dominant mutations in the COMP (EDM1, McKusick 132400) and COL9A2 genes (EDM2, McKusick 600204). A few other patients and families with features similar to our proband have been described previously and considered to have autosomal recessive MED (EDM4, McKusick 226900). This observation confirms the existence of this entity and assigns it to the phenotypic spectrum associated with mutations at the DTDST locus.. 

recessive disorders
DTDST disorders
recessive disorder
Multicentric origin of hemochromatosis gene (HFE) mutations.
Genetic hemochromatosis (GH) is believed to be a disease restricted to those of European ancestry. In northwestern Europe, > 80% of GH patients are homozygous for one mutation, the substitution of tyrosine for cysteine at position 282 (C282Y) in the unprocessed protein. In a proportion of GH patients, two mutations are present, C282Y and H63D. The clinical significance of this second mutation is such that it appears to predispose 1% -2% of compound heterozygotes to expression of the disease. The distribution of the two mutations differ, C282Y being limited to those of northwestern European ancestry and H63D being found at allele frequencies > 5%, in Europe, in countries bordering the Mediterranean, in the Middle East, and in the Indian subcontinent. The C282Y mutation occurs on a haplotype that extends </= 6 Mb, suggesting that this mutation has arisen during the past 2, 000 years. The H63D mutation is older and does not occur on such a large extended haplotype, the haplotype in this case extending </= 700 kb. Here we report the finding of the H63D and C282Y mutations on new haplotypes. In Sri Lanka we have found H63D on three new haplotypes and have found C282Y on one new haplotype, demonstrating that these mutations have arisen independently on this island. These results suggest that the HFE gene has been the subject of selection pressure. These selection pressures could be due to infectious diseases, environmental conditions,  or other genetic disorders such as anemia.

genetic disorders
MEFV-Gene analysis in armenian patients with Familial Mediterranean fever: diagnostic value and unfavorable renal prognosis of the M694V homozygous genotype-genetic and therapeutic implications.
Familial Mediterranean fever (FMF) is a recessively inherited disorder that is common in patients of Armenian ancestry. To date, its diagnosis, which can be made only retrospectively, is one of exclusion, based entirely on nonspecific clinical signs that result from serosal inflammation and that may lead to unnecessary surgery. Renal amyloidosis, prevented by colchicine, is the most severe complication of FMF, a disorder associated with mutations in the MEFV gene. To evaluate the diagnostic and prognostic value of MEFV-gene analysis, we investigated 90 Armenian FMF patients from 77 unrelated families that were not selected through genetic-linkage analysis. Eight mutations, one of which (R408Q) is new, were found to account for 93% of the 163 independent FMF alleles, with both FMF alleles identified in 89% of the patients. In several instances, family studies provided molecular evidence for pseudodominant transmission and incomplete penetrance of the disease phenotype. The M694V homozygous genotype was found to be associated with a higher prevalence of renal amyloidosis and arthritis, compared with other genotypes (P =. 0002 and P =. 006, respectively). The demonstration of both the diagnostic and prognostic value of MEFV analysis and particular modes of inheritance should lead to new ways for management of FMF-including genetic counseling and therapeutic decisions in affected families.

recessively inherited disorder
Abnormal high density lipoproteins in cerebrotendinous xanthomatosis.
The plasma lipoprotein profiles and high density lipoproteins (HDL) were characterized in patients with the genetic disease cerebrotendinous xanthomatosis (CTX). Abnormalities in the HDL may contribute to their increased atherogenesis and excessive deposits of tissue sterols in the presence of low or low-normal concentrations of plasma cholesterol (165 +/- 25 mg/dl) and low density lipoproteins (LDL). The mean HDL-cholesterol concentration in the CTX plasmas was 14. 5 +/- 3. 2 mg/dl, about one-third the normal value. The low HDL-cholesterol reflects a low concentration and an abnormal lipid composition of the plasma HDL. Relative to normal HDL, the cholesteryl esters are low, free cholesterol and phospholipids essentially normal, and triglycerides increased. The ratio of apoprotein (apo) to total cholesterol in the HDL of CTX was two to three times greater than normal. In the CTX HDL, the ratio of apoAI to apoAII was high, the proportion of apoC low, and a normally minor form of apoAI increased relative to other forms. The HDL in electron micrographs appeared normal morphologically and in particle size. The abnormalities in lipoprotein distribution profile and composition of the plasma HDL result from metabolic defects that are not understood but may be linked to the genetic defect in bile acid synthesis in CTX. As a consequence, it is probable that the normal functions of the HDL, possibly including modulation of LDL-cholesterol uptake and the removal of excess cholesterol from peripheral tissues, are perturbed significantly in this disease.

genetic disease
genetic defect
Mutations of the cathepsin C gene are responsible for Papillon-Lefevre syndrome.
Papillon-Lefevre syndrome (PLS) is an autosomal recessive disorder characterised by palmoplantar hyperkeratosis and severe early onset periodontitis that results in the premature loss of the primary and secondary dentitions. A major gene locus for PLS has been mapped to a 2. 8 cM interval on chromosome 11q14. Correlation of physical and genetic maps of this interval indicate it includes at least 40 ESTs and six known genes including the lysosomal protease cathepsin C gene (CTSC). The CTSC message is expressed at high levels in a variety of immune cells including polymorphonuclear leucocytes, macrophages, and their precursors. By RT-PCR, we found CTSC is also expressed in epithelial regions commonly affected by PLS, including the palms, soles, knees, and oral keratinised gingiva. The 4. 7 kb CTSC gene consists of two exons. Sequence analysis of CTSC from subjects affected with PLS from five consanguineous Turkish families identified four different mutations. An exon 1 nonsense mutation (856C-- > T) introduces a premature stop codon at amino acid 286. Three exon 2 mutations were identified, including a single nucleotide deletion (2692delA) of codon 349 introducing a frameshift and premature termination codon, a 2 bp deletion (2673-2674delCT) that results in introduction of a stop codon at amino acid 343, and a G-- > A substitution in codon 429 (2931G-- > A) introducing a premature termination codon. All PLS patients were homozygous for cathepsin C mutations inherited from a common ancestor. Parents and sibs heterozygous for cathepsin C mutations do not show either the palmoplantar hyperkeratosis or severe early onset periodontitis characteristic of PLS. A more complete understanding of the functional physiology of cathepsin C carries significant implications for understanding normal and abnormal skin development and periodontal disease susceptibility 

autosomal recessive disorder
Four novel PEPD alleles causing prolidase deficiency.
Mutations at the PEPD locus cause prolidase deficiency (McKusick 170100), a rare autosomal recessive disorder characterized by iminodipeptiduria, skin ulcers, mental retardation, and recurrent infections. Four PEPD mutations from five severely affected individuals were characterized by analysis of reverse-transcribed, PCR-amplified (RT-PCR) cDNA. We used SSCP analysis on four overlapping cDNA fragments covering the entire coding region of the PEPD gene and detected abnormal SSCP bands for the fragment spanning all or part of exons 13-15 in three of the probands. Direct sequencing of the mutant cDNAs showed a G-- > A, 1342 substitution (G448R) in two patients and a 3-bp deletion (delta E452 or delta E453) in another. In the other two probands the amplified products were of reduced size. Direct sequencing of these mutant cDNAs revealed a deletion of exon 5 in one patient and of exon 7 in the other. Intronic sequences flanking exons 5 and 7 were identified using inverse PCR followed by direct sequencing. Conventional PCR and direct sequencing then established the intron-exon borders of the mutant genomic DNA revealing two splice acceptor mutations  a G-- > C substitution at position -1 of intron 4 and an A-- > G substitution at position -2 of intron 6. Our results indicate that the severe form of prolidase deficiency is caused by multiple PEPD alleles. In this report we attempt to begin the process of describing these alleles and cataloging their phenotypic expression.. 

autosomal recessive disorder
A single origin of phenylketonuria in Yemenite Jews.
Phenylketonuria (PKU) is a metabolic disease caused by recessive mutations of the gene encoding the hepatic enzyme phenylalanine hydroxylase (PAH). The incidence of PKU varies widely across different geographic areas, and is highest (about 1 in 5, 000 live births) in Ireland and western Scotland, and among Yemenite Jews. A limited number of point mutations account for most of the PKU cases in the European population. Here we report that a single molecular defect--a deletion spanning the third exon of the PAH gene--is responsible for all the PKU cases among the Yemenite Jews. Examination of a random sample of Yemenite Jews using a molecular probe that detects the carriers of this deletion indicated a high frequency of the defective gene in this community. Although the deleted PAH gene was traced to 25 different locations throughout Yemen, family histories and official documents of the Yemenite Jewish community showed that the common ancestor of all the carriers of this genetic defect lived in Sana, the capital of Yemen, before the eighteenth century.. 

genetic defect
Splice-site mutation in the PDS gene may result in intrafamilial variability for deafness in Pendred syndrome.
Pendred syndrome is a recessive inherited disorder that consists of developmental abnormalities of the cochlea, sensorineural hearing loss, and diffuse thyroid enlargement (goiter). This disorder may account for up to 10% of cases of hereditary deafness. The disease gene (PDS) has been mapped to chromosome 7q22-q31, and encodes a chloride-iodide transport protein. We performed mutation analysis of individual exons of the PDS gene in one Spanish family that shows intrafamilial variability of the deafness phenotype (two patients with profound and one with moderate-severe deafness). We identified a new splice-site mutation affecting intron 4 of the PDS gene, at nucleotide position 639 + 7. RNA analysis from lymphocytes of the affected patients showed that mutation 639 + 7A-- > G generates a new donor splice site, leading to an mRNA with an insertion of six nucleotides from intron 4 of PDS. Since the newly created donor splice site is likely to compete with the normal one, variations of the levels of normal and aberrant transcripts of the PDS gene in the cochlea may explain the variability in the deafness presentation.. 

recessive inherited disorder
hereditary deafness
Heterozygous loss of Six5 in mice is sufficient to cause ocular cataracts.
Myotonic dystrophy (DM) is an autosomal dominant disorder characterized by skeletal muscle wasting, myotonia, cardiac arrhythmia, hyperinsulinaemia, mental retardation and ocular cataracts. The genetic defect in DM is a CTG repeat expansion located in the 3 untranslated region of DMPK and 5 of a homeodomain-encoding gene, SIX5 (formerly DMAHP; refs 2-5). There are three mechanisms by which CTG expansion can result in DM. First, repeat expansion may alter the processing or transport of the mutant DMPK mRNA and consequently reduce DMPK levels. Second, CTG expansion may establish a region of heterochromatin 3 of the repeat sequence and decrease SIX5 transcription. Third, toxic effects of the repeat expansion may be intrinsic to the repeated elements at the level of DNA or RNA (refs 10, 11). Previous studies have demonstrated that a dose-dependent loss of Dm15 (the mouse DMPK homologue) in mice produces a partial DM phenotype characterized by decreased development of skeletal muscle force and cardiac conduction disorders. To test the role of Six5 loss in DM, we have analysed a strain of mice in which Six5 was deleted. Our results demonstrate that the rate and severity of cataract formation is inversely related to Six5 dosage and is temporally progressive. Six5 +/- and Six5-/- mice show increased steady-state levels of the Na +/K + -ATPase alpha-1 subunit and decreased Dm15 mRNA levels. Thus, altered ion homeostasis within the lens may contribute to cataract formation. As ocular cataracts are a characteristic feature of DM, these results demonstrate that decreased SIX5 transcription is important in the aetiology of DM. Our data support the hypothesis that DM is a contiguous gene syndrome associated with the partial loss of both DMPK and SIX5.. 

autosomal dominant disorde
genetic defect
Identification of a novel R21X mutation in the liver-type arginase gene (ARG1) in four Portuguese patients with argininemia.
Argininemia is a rare autossomal recessive disorder caused by deficiency in the cytosolic liver-type arginase enzyme (L-arginine urea-hydrolase; E. C. 3. 5. 3. 1). In order to investigate the molecular basis for argininemia in four unrelated Portuguese patients (two from northern Portugal and two from Madeira Island) we performed a DNA sequence analysis of all the exons and exon/intron boundaries of the liver-type arginase gene (ARG1). All patients were found to be homozygous for a newly identified C - > T transition in codon 21 (exon 2) substituting arginine for a premature stop codon (R21X  CGA to TGA) and generating a NlaIII restriction site. Restriction digestion following PCR amplification of ARG1 exon 2 confirmed the presence of the mutation.

autossomal recessive disorder
Identification of an altered splice site in Ashkenazi Tay-Sachs disease.
Tay-Sachs disease is an autosomal recessive genetic disorder resulting from mutation of the HEXA gene encoding the alpha-subunit of the lysosomal enzyme, beta-N-acetylhexosaminidase A (ref. 1). A relatively high frequency of carriers (1/27) of a lethal, infantile form of the disease is found in the Ashkenazi Jewish population, but it is not yet evident whether this has resulted from a founder effect and random genetic drift or from a selective advantage of heterozygotes. We have identified a single-base mutation in a cloned fragment of the HEXA gene from an Ashkenazi Jewish patient. This change, the substitution of a C for G in the first nucleotide of intron 12 is expected to result in defective splicing of the messenger RNA. A test for the mutant allele based on amplification of DNA by the polymerase chain rection and cleavage of a DdeI restriction site generated by the mutation revealed that this case and two other cases of the Ashkenazi, infantile form of Tay-Sachs disease are heterozygous for two different mutations. The occurrence of multiple mutant alleles warrants further examination of the selective advantage hypothesis.. 

autosomal recessive genetic disorder
Alstrom syndrome: further evidence for linkage to human chromosome 2p13.
Alstrom syndrome is a rare autosomal recessive disorder characterized by retinal degeneration, sensorineural hearing loss, early-onset obesity, and non-insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus. The gene for Alstrom syndrome (ALMS1) has been previously localized to human chromosome 2p13 by homozygosity mapping in two distinct isolated populations - French Acadian and North African. Pair-wise analyses resulted in maximum lod (logarithm of the odds ratio) scores of 3. 84 and 2. 9, respectively. To confirm these findings, a large linkage study was performed in twelve additional families segregating for Alstrom syndrome. A maximum two-point lod score of 7. 13 (theta = 0. 00) for marker D2S2110 and a maximum cumulative multipoint lod score of 9. 16 for marker D2S2110 were observed, further supporting linkage to chromosome 2p13. No evidence of genetic heterogeneity was observed in these families. Meiotic recombination events have localized the critical region containing ALMS1 to a 6. 1-cM interval flanked by markers D2S327 and D2S286. A fine resolution radiation hybrid map of 31 genes and markers has been constructed.

autosomal recessive disorder
Defective CTLA-4 cycling pathway in Chediak-Higashi syndrome: a possible mechanism for deregulation of T lymphocyte activation.
Cytotoxic T lymphocyte-associated antigen 4 (CTLA-4, also known as CD152) has been shown to play a major role in the regulation of T cell activation. Its membrane expression is highly regulated by endocytosis and trafficking through the secretory lysosome pathway. Chediak-Higashi syndrome (CHS) is an inherited disorder caused by mutations in the lysosomal trafficking regulator gene, LYST. It results in defective membrane targeting of the proteins present in secretory lysosomes, and it is associated with a variety of features, including a lymphoproliferative syndrome with hemophagocytosis. The murine equivalent of CHS, beige mice, present similar characteristics but do not develop the lymphoproliferative syndrome. We show herein that CTLA-4 is present in enlarged, abnormal vesicles in CHS T cells and is not properly expressed at the cell surface after T cell activation, whereas its surface expression is not impaired. It is therefore proposed that the defective surface expression of CTLA-4 by CHS T cells is involved in the generation of lymphoproliferative disease. This observation may provide insight into the role of CTLA-4 in humans.. 

inherited disorder
Somatic rearrangement of chromosome 14 in human lymphocytes.
Ataxia-telangiectasia is a rare genetic disorder associated with immune deficiency, chromosome instability, and a predisposition to lymphoid malignancy. We have detected chromosomally anomalous clones of lymphocytes in eight patients with this disorder. Chromosome banding disclosed that the clones are consistently marked by structural rearrangement of the long arm (q) of chromosome 14. A translocation involving 14q was found in clones obtained from seven of the eight patients whereas a ring 14 chromosome was found in a clone obtained from the other. These findings as well as data obtained by others for patients with ataxia-telangiectasia suggest that structural rearrangement of 14q is the initial chromosomal change in lymphocyte clones of patients with this disorder. Chromosomes of lymphocytes from one of the patients were studied before and after the onset of chronic lymphocytic leukemia. Before leukemia was diagnosed, the patient had a lymphocyte clone with a 14q translocation. This clone appears to have given rise to the leukemic cells. We hypothesize that structural rearrangement of 14q is directly related to abnormal growth of lymphocytes and that it may be a step toward the development of lymphoid malignancies. Increasing evidence, provided by others, for the nonrandom involvement of 14q in African-type Burkitts lymphoma and other lymphoid neoplasms further strengthens this hypothesis.. 

genetic disorder
Two missense mutations causing mild hyperphenylalaninemia associated with DNA haplotype 12.
The genetic defects responsible for most phenylketonuria (PKU) and hyperphenylalaninemia (HPA) cases are located in the phenylalanine hydroxylase (PAH) gene. Approximately 50-60 mutations have been reported in Caucasians and are reflected in a wide range of clinical severities. Most mutations are linked to specific haplotypes, as defined by eight polymorphic restriction sites in the PAH gene. We hypothesized that there is at least one mild mutation linked to haplotype 12 in the Swedish PKU/HPA population, since 7 of 8 patients carrying haplotype 12 had mild HPA. Sequence analysis revealed a C-to-G transversion at the second base of codon 322, resulting in a substitution of glycine for alanine, in four mutant haplotype 12 genes, and a G-to-A transition at the second base of codon 408, resulting in a substitution of glutamine for arginine, in another three mutant haplotype 12 genes. These mutations segregated with mutant haplotype 12 alleles in nuclear families but were not present on normal or other mutant alleles. Both mutations were tested in a eukaryotic expression system in which enzyme activities of different mutant PAH enzymes reflect the relative severities of the mutations, although these in vitro activities cannot be translated directly into in vivo hepatic activities. The A322G mutant PAH had about 75% and the R408Q mutant PAH about 55% of the wild-type PAH enzyme activity. These in vitro activities are the highest reported for mutant PAH enzymes produced in the same expression system. (ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS). 

genetic defects
A potential animal model for Lesch-Nyhan syndrome through introduction of HPRT mutations into mice.
The human Lesch-Nyhan syndrome is a rare neurological and behavioural disorder, affecting only males, which is caused by an inherited deficiency in the level of activity of the purine salvage enzyme hypoxanthine-guanosine phosphoribosyl transferase (HPRT). How the resulting alterations in purine metabolism lead to the severe symptoms characteristic of Lesch-Nyhan patients is still not understood. No mutations at the Hprt locus leading to loss of activity have been described in laboratory animals. To derive an animal model for the Lesch-Nyhan syndrome, we have used cultured mouse embryonic stem cells, mutagenized by retroviral insertion and selected for loss of HPRT activity, to construct chimaeric mice. Two clonal lines carrying different mutant Hprt alleles have given rise to germ cells in chimaeras, allowing the derivation of strains of mutant mice having the same biochemical defect as Lesch-Nyhan patients. Male mice carrying the mutant alleles are viable and analysis of their cells shows a total lack of HPRT activity.. 

inherited deficiency
The mapping of a cDNA from the human X-linked Duchenne muscular dystrophy gene to the mouse X chromosome.
The recent discovery of sequences at the site of the Duchenne muscular dystrophy (DMD) gene in humans has opened up the possibility of a detailed molecular analysis of the genes in humans and in related mammalian species. Until relatively recently, there was no obvious mouse model of this genetic disease for the development of therapeutic strategies. The identification of a mouse X-linked mutant showing muscular dystrophy, mdx, has provided a candidate mouse genetic homologue to the DMD locus; the relatively mild pathological features of mdx suggest it may have more in common with mutations of the Becker muscular dystrophy type at the same human locus, however. But the close genetic linkage of mdx to G6PD and Hprt on the mouse X chromosome, coupled with its comparatively mild pathology, have suggested that the mdx mutation may instead correspond to Emery Dreifuss muscular dystrophy which itself is closely linked to DNA markers at Xq28-qter in the region of G6PD on the human X chromosome. Using an interspecific mouse domesticus/spretus cross, segregating for a variety of markers on the mouse X chromosome, we have positioned on the mouse X chromosome sequences homologous to a DMD cDNA clone. These sequences map provocatively close to the mdx mutation and unexpectedly distant from sparse fur, spf, the mouse homologue of OTC (ornithine transcarbamylase) which is closely linked to DMD on the human X chromosome.. 

genetic disease
The human factor IX gene as germline mutagen test: samples from Mainland China have the putatively endogenous pattern of mutation.
Germline mutations are the major source of genetic variation that allows a species to evolve over time but at the cost of Mendelian disease and genetic predisposition to multifactorial diseases. Previous analyses have revealed that the pattern of germline mutations in the factor IX gene (F9) is similar among a variety of ethnically and geographically diverse populations and compatible with the ancient pattern that has shaped the mammalian genome. Here, we compare the pattern of germline mutation in a population of hemophilia B patients from Mainland China (n = 66) to that in U. S. Caucasians, Blacks, and Mexican Hispanics and stratify by disease severity and ethnicity. The similar pattern of germline mutation in all ethnic groups studied to date provides additional data compatible with the inference that endogenous processes predominate in germline mutations. 

Mendelian disease
Novel mutations of the ATP7B gene in Japanese patients with Wilson disease.
Wilson disease (WD) is an autosomal recessive disorder characterized by copper accumulation in the liver, brain, kidneys, and corneas, and culminating in copper toxication in these organs. In this study, we analyzed mutations of the responsible gene, ATP7B, in four Japanese patients with WD. By direct sequencing, we identified five mutations, of which two were novel, and 16 polymorphisms, of which 6 were novel. The mutations 2871delC and 2513delA shift the reading frame so that truncated abnormal protein is expected. In contrast to these mutations found in patients with hepatic-type of early onset, the mutations A874V, R778L, and 3892delGTC were either missense mutations or in frame 1-amino acid deletion, and occurred in the patients with hepato-neurologic type of late onset. The mutations 2871delC and R778L have been previously reported in a relatively large number of Japanese patients. In particular, R778L is known to be more prevalent in Asian countries than in other countries of the world. Our data are compatible with the hypothesis that the mutations tend to occur in a population-specific manner. Therefore, the accumulation of the types of mutations in Japanese patients with WD will facilitate the fast and effective genetic diagnosis of WD in Japanese patients.. 

autosomal recessive disorder
Predominance of the adrenomyeloneuropathy phenotype of X-linked adrenoleukodystrophy in The Netherlands: a survey of 30 kindreds.
X-linked adrenoleukodystrophy (X-ALD) is an inherited disorder of peroxisomal beta-oxidation associated with accumulation of saturated very long-chain fatty acids, which results in central and peripheral demyelination and in impaired function of adrenal cortex and testes. The phenotypic expression is highly variable, childhood cerebral ALD (CCALD) and adrenomyeloneuropathy (AMN) being the main variants. We explored the 30 Dutch kindreds well known to the Dutch X-ALD/AMN Study Group and phenotyped 77 male patients  35 (46%) had AMN and 24 (31%) CCALD or adolescent cerebral ALD (AdolCALD). These percentages differ significantly from previous reports, in which 25 to 28% of the patients developed AMN and 53 to 57% CCALD or AdolCALD. Our findings indicate that--at least in the Netherlands--AMN may be the most frequent phenotype of X-ALD.. 

inherited disorder
Glucose/galactose malabsorption caused by a defect in the Na+/glucose cotransporter.
Glucose/galactose malabsorption (GGM) is an autosomal recessive disease manifesting within the first weeks of life and characterized by a selective failure to absorb dietary glucose and galactose from the intestine. The consequent severe diarrhoea and dehydration are usually fatal unless these sugars are eliminated from the diet. Intestinal biopsies of GGM patients have revealed a specific defect in Na (+) -dependent absorption of glucose in the brush border. Normal glucose absorption is mediated by the Na +/glucose cotransporter in the brush border membrane of the intestinal epithelium. Cellular influx is driven by the transmembrane Na + electrochemical potential gradient; thereafter the sugar moves to the blood across the basolateral membrane via the facilitated glucose carrier. We have previously cloned and sequenced a Na +/glucose cotransporter from normal human ileum and shown that this gene, SGLT1, resides on the distal q arm of chromosome 22. We have now amplified SGLT1 complementary DNA and genomic DNA from members of a family affected with GGM by the polymerase chain reaction. Sequence analysis of the amplified products has revealed a single missense mutation in SGLT1 which cosegregates with the GGM phenotype and results in a complete loss of Na (+) -dependent glucose transport in Xenopus oocytes injected with this complementary RNA.. 

autosomal recessive disease
Atm and Bax cooperate in ionizing radiation-induced apoptosis in the central nervous system.
Ataxia-telangiectasia is a hereditary multisystemic disease resulting from mutations of ataxia telangiectasia, mutated (ATM) and is characterized by neurodegeneration, cancer, immune defects, and hypersensitivity to ionizing radiation. The molecular details of ATM function in the nervous system are unclear, although the neurological lesion in ataxia-telangiectasia becomes apparent early in life, suggesting a developmental origin. The central nervous system (CNS) of Atm-null mice shows a pronounced defect in apoptosis induced by genotoxic stress, suggesting ATM functions to eliminate neurons with excessive genomic damage. Here, we report that the death effector Bax is required for a large proportion of Atm-dependent apoptosis in the developing CNS after ionizing radiation (IR). Although many of the same regions of the CNS in both Bax-/- and Atm-/- mice were radioresistant, mice nullizygous for both Bax and Atm showed additional reduction in IR-induced apoptosis in the CNS. Therefore, although the major IR-induced apoptotic pathway in the CNS requires Atm and Bax, a p53-dependent collateral pathway exists that has both Atm- and Bax-independent branches. Further, Atm- and Bax-dependent apoptosis in the CNS also required caspase-3 activation. These data implicate Bax and caspase-3 as death effectors in neurodegenerative pathways.. 

hereditary multisystemic disease
Malignant neoplasms in the families of patients with ataxia-telangiectasia.
Ataxia-telangiectasia (A-T) is an autosomal recessive syndrome associated with a greatly increased incidence of malignant neoplasms in homozygous affected individuals. Heterozygotes for the gene for A-T are thought to comprise about 1% of the general population and, therefore, it is important to know whether this gene also predisposes the heterozygous carrier to cancers. Heterozygous carriers of this gene are common among the close relatives of patients with A-T, although individual carriers cannot be identified by any clinical criterion or laboratory test. For this reason, we compared the incidence of death from malignant neoplasms in 2 families of patients with A-T to that expected in a random sample of the general population. There were 59 deaths from malignant neoplasms in relatives dying before age 75, compared to 42. 6 expected (p less than 0. 02). For A-T heterozygotes younger than age 45, the risk of dying from a malignant neoplasm was estimated to be greater than 5 times the risk for the general population. A-T heterozygotes may comprise more than 5% of all persons dying from a cancer before age 45. The incidence of ovarian, gastric, and biliary system carcinomas and of leukemia and lymphoma was increased in these A-T families. Other neoplasms that may be associated with this gene in heterozygotes include pancreatic, basal cell, colonic, breast, and cervical carcinomas.

autosomal recessive syndrome
Molecular genetics of PKU in eastern Europe: a nonsense mutation associated with haplotype 4 of the phenylalanine hydroxylase gene.
Phenylketonuria (PKU) is a genetic disorder secondary to a deficiency of hepatic phenylalanine hydroxylase (PAH). Several mutations in the PAH gene have recently been reported, and linkage disequilibrium was observed between RFLP haplotypes and specific mutations. A new molecular lesion has been identified in exon 7 of the PAH gene in a Hungarian PKU patient by direct sequencing of PCR-amplified DNA. The C-to-T transition causes the substitution of Arg243 to a termination codon, and the mutant allele is associated with haplotype 4 of the PAH gene. The mutation is present in two of nine mutant haplotype 4 alleles among Eastern Europeans and is not present among Western Europeans and Asians. The rarity of this mutant allele and its restricted geographic distribution suggest that the mutational event occurred recently on a normal haplotype 4 background in Eastern Europe.. 

genetic disorder
molecular lesion
Study of the voltage-gated sodium channel beta 1 subunit gene (SCN1B) in the benign familial infantile convulsions syndrome (BFIC).
Benign familial infantile convulsions (BFIC) is a rare autosomal dominant epilepsy syndrome. This syndrome has been recently described in Italian and French pedigrees. Patients present with partial, then generalized seizures, with onset at age three months. The seizures usually spontaneously cease after one year without treatment, leaving no neurological abnormalities. We have mapped BFIC to chromosome 19q in five Italian pedigrees. The sodium channel beta1 subunit gene (SCN1B) maps to this candidate region and has been shown to be involved in one Australian pedigree with generalized epilepsy and febrile seizures " plus " (GEFS +). In this family, a missense mutation in SCN1B cosegregates with the GEFS + phenotype. BFIC and GEFS + have clinical features in common, therefore SCN1B is a candidate gene for BFIC. We studied SCN1B exons 1, 2, 3, 4, and 5, using four SSCP methods in 10 Caucasian BFIC probands of Western Europe. We found no exon variants. One variant was identified in intron 5 (IVS5-10C > G), which did not segregate with BFIC and was observed in 9. 2% controls. A second variant in intron 5 was identified (IVS5 + 30G > A). It was rare, as not observed in controls, but not segregating with the BFIC phenotype. 

autosomal dominant epilepsy syndrome
Genetic cholesteryl ester transfer protein deficiency caused by two prevalent mutations as a major determinant of increased levels of high density lipoprotein cholesterol.
Genetic determinants of HDL cholesterol (HDL-C) levels in the general population are poorly understood. We previously described plasma cholesteryl ester transfer protein (CETP) deficiency due to an intron 14 G (+ 1) -to-A mutation (Int14 A) in several families with very high HDL-C levels in Japan. Subjects with HDL-C > or = 100 mg/dl (n = 130) were screened by PCR single strand conformational polymorphism analysis of the CETP gene. Two other mutations were identified by DNA sequencing or primer-mediated restriction map modification of PCR products  a novel intron 14 splice donor site mutation caused by a T insertion at position + 3 from the exon14/intron14 boundary (Int14 T) and a missense mutation (Asp442 to Gly) within exon 15 (D442G). The Int14 T mutation was only found in one family. However, the D442G and Int14 A mutations were highly prevalent in subjects with HDL-C > or = 60 mg/dl, with combined allele frequencies of 9%, 12%, 21% and 43% for HDL-C 60-79, 80-99, 100-119, and > or = 120 mg/dl, respectively. Furthermore, prevalences of the D442G and Int14 A mutations were extremely high in a general sample of Japanese men (n = 236), with heterozygote frequencies of 7% and 2%, respectively. These two mutations accounted for about 10% of the total variance of HDL-C in this population. The phenotype in a genetic compound heterozygote (Int14 T and Int14 A) was similar to that of Int14 A homozygotes (no detectable CETP and markedly increased HDL-C), indicating that the Int14 T produces a null allele. In four D442G homozygotes, mean HDL-C levels (86 +/- 26 mg/dl) were lower than in Int14 A homozygotes (158 +/- 35 mg/dl), reflecting residual CETP activity in plasma. In 47 D442G heterozygotes, mean HDL-C levels were 91 +/- 23 mg/dl, similar to the level in D442G homozygotes, and significantly greater than mean HDL-C levels in Int14 A heterozygotes (69 +/- 15 mg/dl). Thus, the D442G mutation acts differently to the null mutations with weaker effects on HDL in the homozygous state and stronger effects in the heterozygotes, suggesting dominant expression of a partially defective allele. CETP deficiency, reflecting two prevalent mutations (D442G and Int14 A), is the first example of a genetic deficiency state which is sufficiently common to explain a significant fraction of the variation in HDL-C in the general population.. 

genetic deficiency
Family studies in Bechterew's syndrome (ankylosing spondylitis) III. Genetics.
The results of segregation analyses in 75 families where the proband had ankylosing spondylitis, are presented. Of the 278 adult, living first degree relatives, approximately 85% cooperated in the study. Clinical and radiographical examinations were performed and HLA typing was conducted. The results were in agreement with our hypothesis that ankylosing spondylitis is part of a syndrome where different genetic factors interact. Such known factors are HLA B27 associated disease susceptibility, susceptibility to psoriatic arthropathy and susceptibility to entero-arthropathy. Radiographical sacro-iliitis was restricted to HLA B27 positive relatives, and was more frequently found in relatives to probands with psoriasis than in relatives to probands without psoriasis. Environmental factors (intestinal bacteria) are known to trigger the disease at least in some persons, and we have postulated that all or most of them have the predisposition to develop disease. Thus, the syndrome has a multifactorial etiology. The phenotypic expressions of the different genetic predispositions involved, include sacro-iliitis, psoriasis, acute anterior uveitis, peripheral arthropathy and inflammatory bowel disease. We suggest the descriptive name HEREDITARY MULTIFOCAL RELAPSING INFLAMMATION (HEMRI) for this syndrome. Ankylosing spondylitis, psoriatic arthropathy and entero-arthropathy may be regarded as clinical sub-types of the syndrome.. 

HEREDITARY MULTIFOCAL RELAPSING INFLAMMATION
HEMRI
The gene for familial Mediterranean fever, MEFV, is expressed in early leukocyte development and is regulated in response to inflammatory mediators.
Familial Mediterranean fever (FMF) is a recessive disorder characterized by episodes of fever and neutrophil-mediated serosal inflammation. We recently identified the gene causing FMF, designated MEFV, and found it to be expressed in mature neutrophils, suggesting that it functions as an inflammatory regulator. To facilitate our understanding of the normal function of MEFV, we extended our previous studies. MEFV messenger RNA was detected by reverse transcriptase-polymerase chain reaction in bone marrow leukocytes, with differential expression observed among cells by in situ hybridization. CD34 hematopoietic stem-cell cultures induced toward the granulocytic lineage expressed MEFV at the myelocyte stage, concurrently with lineage commitment. The prepromyelocytic cell line HL60 expressed MEFV only at granulocytic and monocytic differentiation. MEFV was also expressed in the monocytic cell lines U937 and THP-1. Among peripheral blood leukocytes, MEFV expression was detected in neutrophils, eosinophils, and to varying degrees, monocytes. Consistent with the tissue specificity of expression, complete sequencing and analysis of upstream regulatory regions of MEFV revealed homology to myeloid-specific promoters and to more broadly expressed inflammatory promoter elements. In vitro stimulation of monocytes with the proinflammatory agents interferon (IFN) gamma, tumor necrosis factor, and lipopolysaccharide induced MEFV expression, whereas the antiinflammatory cytokines interleukin (IL) 4, IL-10, and transforming growth factor beta inhibited such expression. Induction by IFN-gamma occurred rapidly and was resistant to cycloheximide. IFN-alpha also induced MEFV expression. In granulocytes, MEFV was up-regulated by IFN-gamma and the combination of IFN-alpha and colchicine. These results refine understanding of MEFV by placing the gene in the myelomonocytic-specific proinflammatory pathway and identifying it as an IFN-gamma immediate early gene.. 

recessive disorder
Targeted modification of the apolipoprotein B gene results in hypobetalipoproteinemia and developmental abnormalities in mice.
Familial hypobetalipoproteinemia is an autosomal codominant disorder resulting in a dramatic reduction in plasma concentrations of apolipoprotein (apo) B, cholesterol, and beta-migrating lipoproteins. A benefit of hypobetalipoproteinemia is that mildly affected individuals may be protected from coronary vascular disease. We have used gene targeting to generate mice with a modified Apob allele. Mice containing this allele display all of the hallmarks of human hypobetalipoproteinemia  they produce a truncated apoB protein, apoB70, and have markedly decreased plasma concentrations of apoB, beta-lipoproteins, and total cholesterol. In addition, the mice manifest several characteristics that are occasionally observed in human hypobetalipoproteinemia, including reduced plasma triglyceride concentrations, fasting chylomicronemia, and reduced high density lipoprotein cholesterol. An unexpected finding is that the modified Apob allele is strongly associated with exencephalus and hydrocephalus. These mice should help increase our understanding of hypobetalipoproteinemia, atherogenesis, and the etiology of exencephalus and hydrocephalus.. 

autosomal codominant disorder
GT to AT transition at a splice donor site causes skipping of the preceding exon in phenylketonuria.
Classical Phenylketonuria (PKU) is an autosomal recessive human genetic disorder caused by a deficiency of hepatic phenylalanine hydroxylase (PAH). We isolated several mutant PAH cDNA clones from a PKU carrier individual and showed that they contained an internal 116 base pair deletion, corresponding precisely to exon 12 of the human chromosomal PAH gene. The deletion causes the synthesis of a truncated protein lacking the C-terminal 52 amino acids. Gene transfer and expression studies using the mutant PAH cDNA indicated that the deletion abolishes PAH activity in the cell as a result of protein instability. To determine the molecular basis of the deletion, the mutant chromosomal PAH gene was isolated from this individual and shown to contain a GT-- greater than AT substitution at the 5 splice donor site of intron 12. Thus, the consequence of the splice donor site mutation in the human liver is the skipping of the preceding exon during RNA splicing.. 

autosomal recessive human genetic disorder
Genetic analysis of a Japanese family with normotriglyceridemic abetalipoproteinemia indicates a lack of linkage to the apolipoprotein B gene.
Normotriglyceridemic abetalipoproteinemia is a rare familial disorder characterized by an isolated deficiency of apoB-100. We have previously reported a patient with this disease, who had normal apoB-48 but no apoB-100. To elucidate the genetic abnormalities in this family, we studied the linkage of apoB gene using three genetic markers. The proband and her affected brother showed completely different apoB gene alleles, suggesting that the apoB gene itself is not related to this disorder in this family. By contrast, an American case had a point substitution in the apoB gene generating an in-frame stop codon. These results indicate that this disorder can be caused by defect (s) of either an apoB gene or other genes.. 

genetic abnormalities
Haim-Munk syndrome and Papillon-Lefevre syndrome are allelic mutations in cathepsin C.
Of the many palmoplantar keratoderma (PPK) conditions, only Papillon-Lefevre syndrome (PLS) and Haim-Munk syndrome (HMS) are associated with premature periodontal destruction. Although both PLS and HMS share the cardinal features of PPK and severe periodontitis, a number of additional findings are reported in HMS including arachnodactyly, acro-osteolysis, atrophic changes of the nails, and a radiographic deformity of the fingers. While PLS cases have been identified throughout the world, HMS has only been described among descendants of a religious isolate originally from Cochin, India. Parental consanguinity is a characteristic of many cases of both conditions. Although autosomal recessive transmission of PLS is evident, a more " complex " autosomal recessive pattern of inheritance with phenotypic influences from a closely linked modifying locus has been hypothesised for HMS. Recently, mutations of the cathepsin C gene have been identified as the underlying genetic defect in PLS. To determine if a cathepsin C mutation is also responsible for HMS, we sequenced the gene in affected and unaffected subjects from the Cochin isolate in which both the PLS and HMS phenotypes appear. Here we report identification of a mutation of cathepsin C (exon 6, 2127A-- > G) that changes a highly conserved amino acid in the cathepsin C peptide. This mutation segregates with HMS in four nuclear families. Additionally, the existence of a shared common haplotype for genetic loci flanking the cathepsin C gene suggests that affected subjects descended from the Cochin isolate are homozygous for a mutation inherited " identical by descent " from a common ancestor. This finding supports simple autosomal recessive inheritance for HMS in these families. We also report a mutation of the same exon 6 CTSC codon (2126C-- > T) in a Turkish family with classical PLS. These findings provide evidence that PLS and HMS are allelic variants of cathepsin C gene mutations.. 

genetic defect
Two distinct mutations at a single BamHI site in phenylketonuria.
Classical phenylketonuria is an autosomal recessive disease caused by a deficiency of hepatic phenylalanine hydroxylase (PAH). The abolition of an invariant BamHI site located in the coding sequence of the PAH gene (exon 7) led to the recognition of two new point mutations at codon 272 and 273 (272gly----stop and 273ser----phe, respectively). Both mutations were detected in north eastern France or Belgium and occurred on the background of RFLP haplotype 7 alleles. The present study supports the view that the clinical heterogeneity in PKU is accounted for by the large variety of mutant genotypes associated with PAH deficiencies.. 

autosomal recessive disease
Functional link between ataxia-telangiectasia and Nijmegen breakage syndrome gene products.
Ataxia-telangiectasia (A-T) and Nijmegen breakage syndrome (NBS) are recessive genetic disorders with susceptibility to cancer and similar cellular phenotypes. The protein product of the gene responsible for A-T, designated ATM, is a member of a family of kinases characterized by a carboxy-terminal phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase-like domain. The NBS1 protein is specifically mutated in patients with Nijmegen breakage syndrome and forms a complex with the DNA repair proteins Rad50 and Mrel1. Here we show that phosphorylation of NBS1, induced by ionizing radiation, requires catalytically active ATM. Complexes containing ATM and NBS1 exist in vivo in both untreated cells and cells treated with ionizing radiation. We have identified two residues of NBS1, Ser 278 and Ser 343 that are phosphorylated in vitro by ATM and whose modification in vivo is essential for the cellular response to DNA damage. This response includes S-phase checkpoint activation, formation of the NBS1/Mrel1/Rad50 nuclear foci and rescue of hypersensitivity to ionizing radiation. Together, these results demonstrate a biochemical link between cell-cycle checkpoints activated by DNA damage and DNA repair in two genetic diseases with overlapping phenotypes.. 

recessive genetic disorders
genetic diseases
Mechanism of increased iron absorption in murine model of hereditary hemochromatosis : increased duodenal expression of the iron transporter DMT1.
Hereditary hemochromatosis (HH) is a common autosomal recessive disorder characterized by tissue iron deposition secondary to excessive dietary iron absorption. We recently reported that HFE, the protein defective in HH, was physically associated with the transferrin receptor (TfR) in duodenal crypt cells and proposed that mutations in HFE attenuate the uptake of transferrin-bound iron from plasma by duodenal crypt cells, leading to up-regulation of transporters for dietary iron. Here, we tested the hypothesis that HFE-/- mice have increased duodenal expression of the divalent metal transporter (DMT1). By 4 weeks of age, the HFE-/- mice demonstrated iron loading when compared with HFE +/+ littermates, with elevated transferrin saturations (68. 4% vs. 49. 8%) and elevated liver iron concentrations (985 micrograms vs. 381 micrograms). By using Northern blot analyses, we quantitated duodenal expression of both classes of DMT1 transcripts  one containing an iron responsive element (IRE), called DMT1 (IRE), and one containing no IRE, called DMT1 (non-IRE). The positive control for DMT1 up-regulation was a murine model of dietary iron deficiency that demonstrated greatly increased levels of duodenal DMT1 (IRE) mRNA. HFE-/- mice also demonstrated an increase in duodenal DMT1 (IRE) mRNA (average 7. 7-fold), despite their elevated transferrin saturation and hepatic iron content. Duodenal expression of DMT1 (non-IRE) was not increased, nor was hepatic expression of DMT1 increased. These data support the model for HH in which HFE mutations lead to inappropriately low crypt cell iron, with resultant stabilization of DMT1 (IRE) mRNA, up-regulation of DMT1, and increased absorption of dietary iron.

autosomal recessive disorder
Identification of WASP mutations in patients with Wiskott-Aldrich syndrome and isolated thrombocytopenia reveals allelic heterogeneity at the WAS locus.
Mutation in the gene encoding the recently isolated WASP protein has now been identified as the genetic defect responsible for the X-linked Wiskott-Aldrich syndrome (WAS), a primary immunodeficiency disease associated with extensive phenotypic variability. To elucidate the range of WASP mutations responsible for WAS, we used PCR-SSCP analysis to screen for WASP gene mutation in 19 unrelated boys with the diagnosis of classical or attenuated WAS or isolated thrombocytopenia. All 19 patients had WASP mutations, each of which localized to the initial three or terminal three exons of the gene, and the majority of which were unique in each case. However, a missense mutation which results in substitution of the arginine at WAS codon 86 was identified in three boys with severe WAS as well as in one boy presenting with thrombocytopenia alone. While the three mutations found in the isolated thrombocytopenia patients leave the reading frame intact, about one-half of the gene alterations detected in both severe and attenuated WAS patients result in frameshifted transcript and premature translation termination. These findings therefore confirm the association of WAS with WASP mutation and identify WASP mutation as a cause for isolated congenital thrombocytopenia in males. While the WASP gene defects responsible for isolated thrombocytopenia and other mild presentations of WAS do not appear distinct from those resulting in severe WAS, these data indicate that analysis of WASP gene mutation provides a valuable tool for distinguishing the spectrum of WAS patients and the subset of males with isolated thrombocytopenia who represent mild cases of WAS.. 

genetic defect
Microdeletions at chromosome bands 1q32-q41 as a cause of Van der Woude syndrome.
Van der Woude syndrome (VWS) is an autosomal dominant disorder comprising cleft lip and/or cleft palate and lip pits. We reported previously a family whose underlying mutation is a 500-800 kb deletion localized to chromosome bands 1q32-q41 [Sander et al., 1994  Hum Mol Genet 3  576-578]. Along with cleft lip/palate and lip pits, affected relatives exhibit developmental delays, suggesting that the function of a gene nearby may also be disrupted. To further localize the VWS gene we searched for other deletions that cause VWS. An allele loss assay was performed using a novel highly polymorphic marker, D1S3753. From a panel of 37 unrelated individuals, we detected an allele loss in one family, indicating the presence of a deletion. In this family, the phenotype in three generations of affected individuals was confined to the cardinal signs of VWS. Surprisingly, mapping of the new deletion showed that it extended 0. 2-1 Mb beyond the proximal breakpoint for the deletion described previously. No deletions were detected in seven cases of popliteal pterygia syndrome, 76 cases of mixed syndromic forms of cleft lip and palate, and 178 cases of nonsyndromic cleft lip and palate. 

autosomal dominant disorder
Mucopolysaccharidosis type IVA: common double deletion in the N-acetylgalactosamine-6-sulfatase gene (GALNS).
Mucopolysaccharidosis IVA (MPS IVA) is an autosomal recessive disorder caused by a deficiency in N-acetylgalactosamine-6-sulfatase (GALNS). We found two separate deletions of nearly 8. 0 and 6. 0 kb in the GALNS gene, including some exons. There are Alu repetitive elements near the breakpoints of the 8. 0-kb deletion, and this deletion resulted from an Alu-Alu recombination. The other 6. 0-kb deletion involved illegitimate recombinational events between incomplete short direct repeats of 8 bp at deletion breakpoints. The same rearrangement has been observed in a heteroallelic state in four unrelated patients. This is the first documentation of a common double deletion a gene that is not a member of a gene cluster.

autosomal recessive disorder
A mutation common in non-Jewish Tay-Sachs disease: frequency and RNA studies.
Tay-Sachs disease (TSD) is an autosomal recessive genetic disorder resulting from mutation of the HEXA gene encoding the alpha-subunit of the lysosomal enzyme, beta-N-acetylhexosaminidase A (Hex A). We have discovered that a Tay-Sachs mutation, IVS-9 + 1 G-- > A, first detected by Akli et al. (Genomics 11  124-134, 1991), is a common disease allele in non-Jewish Caucasians (10/58 alleles examined). A PCR-based diagnostic test, which detects an NlaIII site generated by the mutation, revealed a frequency among enzyme-defined carriers of 9/64 (14%). Most of those carrying the allele trace their origins to the United Kingdom, Ireland, or Western Europe. It was not identified among 12 Black American TSD alleles or in any of 18 Ashkenazi Jewish, enzyme-defined carriers who did not carry any of the mutations common to this population. No normally spliced RNA was detected in PCR products generated from reverse transcription of RNA carrying the IVS-9 mutation. Instead, the low levels of mRNA from this allele were comprised of aberrant species resulting from the use of either of two cryptic donor sites, one truncating exon 9 and the other within IVS-9, spliced to exon 10. Numerous additional splice products were detected, most involving skipping of one or more surrounding exons. Together with a recently identified allele responsible for Hex A pseudodeficiency (Triggs-Raine et al. Am J Hum Genet, 1992), these two alleles accounted for almost 50% (29/64) of TSD or carrier alleles ascertained by enzyme screening tests in non-Jewish Caucasians.. 

autosomal recessive genetic disorder
Characterisation of molecular defects in X-linked amelogenesis imperfecta (AIH1).
Amelogenins are an heterogenous family of proteins produced by ameloblasts of the enamel organ during tooth development. Disturbances of enamel formation occur in amelogenesis imperfecta, a clinically heterogenous group of inherited disorders characterised by defective enamel biomineralisation. An amelogenin gene, AMGX, has been mapped to the short of the X chromosome (Xp22. 1-p22. 3) and has been implicated in the molecular pathology of X-linked amelogenesis imperfecta (AIH1). We have identified three families exhibiting AIH1 and screened the AMGX gene for mutations using single-strand conformational polymorphism analysis and DNA sequencing. Three novel mutations were identified  a C-T substitution in exon 5, and a G-T substitution and single cytosine deletion in exon 6, confirming the existence of extensive allelic heterogeneity in this condition. The identification of family-specific mutations will enable early identification of affected individuals and correlation of clinical phenotype with genotype will facilitate an objective system of disease classification. 

inherited disorders
Sjogren-Larsson syndrome. Impaired fatty alcohol oxidation in cultured fibroblasts due to deficient fatty alcohol:nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide oxidoreductase activity.
Lipid metabolism was studied in cultured skin fibroblasts from patients with the inherited disorder, Sjogren-Larsson syndrome (SLS). Intact SLS fibroblasts incubated in the presence of [1-14C] palmitate accumulated more radioactive hexadecanol than did normal cells, whereas incorporation of radioactivity into other cellular lipids was unaltered. The hexadecanol content of SLS fibroblasts was abnormally elevated. Hexadecanol accumulation was not due to increased fatty alcohol synthesis nor its deficient utilization for glycerol ether synthesis. The half-life of intracellular hexadecanol loaded into SLS fibroblasts was increased (70 min) compared with normal (15 min), and intact SLS fibroblasts showed impaired oxidation of [14C] -hexadecanol to fatty acid. Fatty alcohol  NAD + oxidoreductase, the enzyme catalyzing this reaction, was deficient in SLS fibroblasts. Mean total activity in SLS fibroblasts (n = 5) was 13% of that in normal fibroblasts, and palmitoyl CoA-inhibitable activity was 1% of normal. Fibroblasts from two obligate SLS heterozygotes had enzyme activities intermediate between that in normal fibroblasts and individuals with SLS. These results suggest that the primary defect in SLS is deficiency of fatty alcohol  NAD + oxidoreductase. SLS represents the first inherited disorder in man associated with an isolated abnormality in fatty alcohol metabolism.. 

inherited disorder
inherited disorder
Mutations in the fibrinogen aalpha gene account for the majority of cases of congenital afibrinogenemia.
Congenital afibrinogenemia is a rare, autosomal, recessive disorder characterized by the complete absence of detectable fibrinogen. We previously identified the first causative mutations in a nonconsanguineous Swiss family; the 4 affected persons have homozygous deletions of approximately 11 kb of the fibrinogen alpha (FGA) gene. Haplotype data implied that these deletions occurred on distinct ancestral chromosomes, suggesting that this region may be susceptible to deletion by a common mechanism. We subsequently showed that all the deletions were identical to the base pair and probably resulted from a nonhomologous recombination mediated by 7-bp direct repeats. In this study, we have collected data on 13 additional unrelated patients to identify the causative mutations and to determine the prevalence of the 11-kb deletion. A common recurrent mutation, at the donor splice site of FGA intron 4 (IVS4 + 1 G > T), accounted for 14 of the 26 (54%) alleles. One patient was heterozygous for the previously identified deletion. Three more frameshift mutations, 2 nonsense mutations, and a second splice site mutation were also identified. Consequently, 86% of afibrinogenemia alleles analyzed to date have truncating mutations of FGA, though mutations in all 3 fibrinogen genes, FGG, FGA, and FGB, might be predicted to cause congenital afibrinogenemia.. 

autosomal, recessive disorder
Regional mapping of the phenylalanine hydroxylase gene and the phenylketonuria locus in the human genome.
Phenylketonuria (PKU) is an autosomal recessive disorder of amino acid metabolism caused by a deficiency of the hepatic enzyme phenylalanine hydroxylase (PAH; phenylalanine 4-monooxygenase, EC 1. 14. 16. 1). A cDNA clone for human PAH has previously been used to assign the corresponding gene to human chromosome 12. To define the regional map position of the disease locus and the PAH gene on human chromosome 12, DNA was isolated from human-hamster somatic cell hybrids with various deletions of human chromosome 12 and was analyzed by Southern blot analysis using the human cDNA PAH clone as a hybridization probe. From these results, together with detailed biochemical and cytogenetic characterization of the hybrid cells, the region on chromosome 12 containing the human PAH gene has been defined as 12q14. 3----qter 3----qter. The PAH map position on chromosome 12 was further localized by in situ hybridization of 125I-labeled human PAH cDNA to chromosomes prepared from a human lymphoblastoid cell line. Results of these experiments demonstrated that the region on chromosome 12 containing the PAH gene and the PKU locus in man is 12q22----12q24. 1. These results not only provide a regionalized map position for a major human disease locus but also can serve as a reference point for linkage analysis with other DNA markers on human chromosome 12 

autosomal recessive disorder
Total deficiency of plasma cholesteryl ester transfer protein in subjects homozygous and heterozygous for the intron 14 splicing defect.
The molecular basis of cholesteryl ester transfer protein (CETP) deficiency was investigated in 4 unrelated CETP-deficient families. The high density lipoprotein-cholesterol levels of the probands exceeded 150 mg/dl. The plasma of the probands was totally deficient in CETP activity and mass. The genomic DNA of the patients was amplified by polymerase chain reaction, using two oligonucleotide primers located in the intron 12 and 14 of the CETP gene, and the amplified products were directly sequenced. Two patients were homozygous for a G-to-A change at the 5-splice donor site of the intron 14. The G-to-A change would cause impaired splicing of pre-messenger RNA. The other two probands were heterozygous for the mutation, but totally lacked CETP. Their lipoprotein patterns were also similar to those of the two homozygotes. Thus, other genetic defects or metabolic factors influencing CETP expression are implicated. The data suggest that the G-to-A mutation may be common in human plasma CETP deficiency. Furthermore, there could be compound heterozygotes who totally lack plasma CETP and have lipoprotein profiles similar to those of homozygotes.. 

genetic defects
A 3-base pair in-frame deletion of the phenylalanine hydroxylase gene results in a kinetic variant of phenylketonuria.
Phenylketonuria (PKU) is an autosomal recessive disease due to deficiency of a hepatic enzyme, phenylalanine hydroxylase (PAH). The absence of PAH activity results in typical PKU while persistence of a residual enzyme activity gives rise to variant forms of the disease. We report here a 3-base pair in-frame deletion of the PAH gene (delta 194) in a mild variant, with markedly reduced affinity of the enzyme for phenylalanine (Km = 160 nM), and we provide functional evidence for responsibility of the deletion in the mutant phenotype. Since the deletion was located in the third exon of the gene, which presents no homology with other hydroxylases, we suggest that exon 3 is involved in the specificity of the enzyme for phenylalanine. Finally, since none of the 98 PKU patients tested were found to carry this particular deletion, our study suggests that this molecular event probably occurred recently on the background of a haplotype 2 gene in Portugal.. 

autosomal recessive disease
Clinical and genetic study of Friedreich ataxia in an Australian population.
Friedreich ataxia is an autosomal recessive disorder caused by mutations in the FRDA gene that encodes a 210-amino acid protein called frataxin. An expansion of a GAA trinucleotide repeat in intron 1 of the gene is present in more than 95% of mutant alleles. Of the 83 people we studied who have mutations in FRDA, 78 are homozygous for an expanded GAA repeat; the other five patients have an expansion in one allele and a point mutation in the other. Here we present a detailed clinical and genetic study of a subset of 51 patients homozygous for an expansion of the GAA repeat. We found a correlation between the size of the smaller of the two expanded alleles and age at onset, age into wheelchair, scoliosis, impaired vibration sense, and the presence of foot deformity. There was no significant correlation between the size of the smaller allele and cardiomyopathy, diabetes mellitus, loss of proprioception, or bladder symptoms. The larger allele size correlated with bladder symptoms and the presence of foot deformity. The duration of disease is correlated with wheelchair use and the presence of diabetes, scoliosis, bladder symptoms and impaired proprioception, and vibration sense but no other complications studied.. 

autosomal recessive disorder
ATM-dependent phosphorylation of nibrin in response to radiation exposure.
Mutations in the gene ATM are responsible for the genetic disorder ataxia-telangiectasia (A-T), which is characterized by cerebellar dysfunction, radiosensitivity, chromosomal instability and cancer predisposition. Both the A-T phenotype and the similarity of the ATM protein to other DNA-damage sensors suggests a role for ATM in biochemical pathways involved in the recognition, signalling and repair of DNA double-strand breaks (DSBs). There are strong parallels between the pattern of radiosensitivity, chromosomal instability and cancer predisposition in A-T patients and that in patients with Nijmegen breakage syndrome (NBS). The protein defective in NBS, nibrin (encoded by NBS1), forms a complex with MRE11 and RAD50 (refs 1, 2). This complex localizes to DSBs within 30 minutes after cellular exposure to ionizing radiation (IR) and is observed in brightly staining nuclear foci after a longer period of time. The overlap between clinical and cellular phenotypes in A-T and NBS suggests that ATM and nibrin may function in the same biochemical pathway. Here we demonstrate that nibrin is phosphorylated within one hour of treatment of cells with IR. This response is abrogated in A-T cells that either do not express ATM protein or express near full-length mutant protein. We also show that ATM physically interacts with and phosphorylates nibrin on serine 343 both in vivo and in vitro. Phosphorylation of this site appears to be functionally important because mutated nibrin (S343A) does not completely complement radiosensitivity in NBS cells. ATM phosphorylation of nibrin does not affect nibrin-MRE11-RAD50 association as revealed by radiation-induced foci formation. Our data provide a biochemical explanation for the similarity in phenotype between A-T and NBS.. 

genetic disorder
Mutation of the KIT (mast/stem cell growth factor receptor) protooncogene in human piebaldism.
Piebaldism is an autosomal dominant genetic disorder characterized by cogenital patches of skin and hair from which melanocytes are completely absent. A similar disorder of mouse, dominant white spotting (W), results from mutations of the c-Kit protooncogene, which encodes and receptor for mast/stem cell growth factor. We identified a KIT gene mutation in a proband with classic autosomal dominant piebaldism. This mutation results in a Gly----Arg substitution at codon 664, within the tyrosine kinase domain. This substitution was not seen in any normal individuals and was completely linked to the piebald phenotype in the probands family. Piebaldism in this family thus appears to be the human homologue to dominant white spotting (W) of the mouse.. 

autosomal dominant genetic disorder
Emerin, deficiency of which causes Emery-Dreifuss muscular dystrophy, is localized at the inner nuclear membrane.
X-linked recessive Emery-Dreifuss muscular dystrophy (EDMD) is an inherited muscle disorder characterized by the clinical triad of progressive wasting of humero-peroneal muscles, early contractures of the elbows, Achilles tendons and postcervical muscles, and cardiac conduction block with a high risk of sudden death. The gene for EDMD on Xq28 encodes a novel protein named emerin that localizes at the nuclear membrane of skeletal, cardiac and smooth muscles and some other non-muscle tissues. To investigate a possible physiological role for emerin, we examined the ultrastructural localization of the protein in human skeletal muscle and HeLa cells, using ultrathin cryosections. We found that the immune-labeled colloidal gold particles were localized on the nucleoplasmic surface of the inner nuclear membrane, but not on the nuclear pore. Emerin stayed on the cytoplasmic surface of the nuclear lamina, even after detergent treatment that solubilizes membrane lipids and washes out membrane proteins. These results suggest that emerin anchors at the inner nuclear membrane through the hydrophobic stretch, and protrudes from the hydrophilic region to the nucleoplasm where it interacts with the nuclear lamina. We speculate that emerin contributes to maintain the nuclear structure and stability, as well as nuclear functions, particularly in muscle tissues that have severe stress with rigorous contraction-relaxation movements and calcium flux.. 

inherited muscle disorder
Large heterozygous deletion masquerading as homozygous missense mutation: a pitfall in diagnostic mutation analysis.
The clinical use of molecular analyses in recessive disorders relies on the exact characterization of both mutant alleles in the affected patient. This can be problematic when only part of the gene is examined or when relevant DNA alterations are not recognized by standard methods. We present a child in whom phenylketonuria was apparently caused by homozygosity for the mutation E390G in exon 11 of the phenylalanine hydroxylase (PAH) gene. However, the clinical severity of the disease was not quite as mild as expected, the mutation was not identified in the father despite confirmed paternity, and the paternal allele showed a highly unusual pattern of polymorphic markers in the PAH gene. Presence of a large deletion involving exons 9, 10 and 11 of the phenylalanine hydroxylase gene was confirmed by long-range PCR. Diagnostic DNA analyses should include a comprehensive examination of the whole relevant gene in the patient and confirmation of carrier status in both parents.. 

recessive disorders
Screening for carriers of Tay-Sachs disease among Ashkenazi Jews. A comparison of DNA-based and enzyme-based tests.
BACKGROUND AND METHODS. The prevention of Tay-Sachs disease (GM2 gangliosidosis, type 1) depends on the identification of carriers of the gene for this autosomal recessive disorder. We compared the enzyme-based test widely used in screening for Tay-Sachs disease with a test based on analysis of DNA. We developed methods to detect the three mutations in the HEXA gene that occur with high frequency among Ashkenazi Jews  two mutations cause infantile Tay-Sachs disease, and the third causes the adult-onset form of the disease. DNA segments containing these mutation sites were amplified with the polymerase chain reaction and analyzed for the presence of the mutations. RESULTS. Among 62 Ashkenazi obligate carriers of Tay-Sachs disease, the three specific mutations accounted for all but one of the mutant alleles (98 percent). In 216 Ashkenazi carriers identified by the enzyme test, DNA analysis showed that 177 (82 percent) had one of the identified mutations. Of the 177, 79 percent had the exon 11 insertion mutation, 18 percent had the intron 12 splice-junction mutation, and 3 percent had the less severe exon 7 mutation associated with adult-onset disease. The results of the enzyme tests in the 39 subjects (18 percent) who were defined as carriers but in whom DNA analysis did not identify a mutant allele were probably false positive (although there remains some possibility of unidentified mutations). In addition, of 152 persons defined as noncarriers by the enzyme-based test, 1 was identified as a carrier by DNA analysis (i. e e., a false negative enzyme-test result). CONCLUSIONS. The increased specificity and predictive value of the DNA-based test make it a useful adjunct to the diagnostic tests currently used to screen for carriers of Tay-Sachs disease. 

autosomal recessive disorder
Mutations at the ataxia-telangiectasia locus and clinical phenotypes of A-T patients.
Mutations at the ataxia-telangiectasia (A-T) locus on chromosome band 11q22 cause a distinctive autosomal recessive syndrome in homozygotes and predispose heterozygotes to cancer, ischemic heart disease, and early mortality. PCR amplification from genomic DNA and automated sequencing of the entire coding region (66 exons) and splice junctions detected 77 mutations (85%) in 90 A-T chromosomes. Heteroduplex analysis detected another 42 mutations at the A-T locus. Out of a total of 71 unique mutations, 50 were found only in a single family, and 51 had not been reported previously. Most (58/71, 82%) mutations were frameshift and nonsense mutations that are predicted to cause truncation of the A-T protein; the less common mutation types were missense (9/71, 13%), splicing (3/71, 4%) and one in-frame deletion, 2546 3 (1/71, 1%). The mean survival and height distribution of 134 A-T patients correlated significantly with the specific mutations present in the patients. Patients homozygous for a single truncating mutation, typically near the N-terminal end of the gene, or heterozygous for the in-frame deletion 2546 3, were shorter and had significantly shorter survival than those heterozygous for a splice site or missense mutation, or heterozygous for two truncating mutations. Alterations of the length or amino acid composition of the A-T gene product affect the A-T clinical phenotype in different ways. Mutation analysis at the A-T locus may help estimate the prognosis of A-T patients.. 

autosomal recessive syndrome
Anticipation resulting in elimination of the myotonic dystrophy gene: a follow up study of one extended family.
We have re-examined an extended myotonic dystrophy (DM) family, previously described in 1955, in order to study the long term effects of anticipation in DM and in particular the implications for families affected by this disease. This follow up study provides data on 35 gene carriers and 46 asymptomatic at risk family members in five generations. Clinical anticipation, defined as the cascade of mild, adult, childhood, or congenital disease in subsequent generations, appeared to be a relentless process, occurring in all affected branches of the family. The cascade was found to proceed asynchronously in the different branches, mainly because of an unequal number of generations with mild disease. The transition from the mild to the adult type was associated with transmission through a male parent. Stable transmission of the asymptomatic/mild phenotype showed a female transmission bias. We further examined the extent and causes of gene loss in this pedigree. Gene loss in the patient group was complete, owing to infertility of the male patients with adult onset disease and the fact that mentally retarded patients did not procreate. Out of the 46 at risk subjects in the two youngest generations, only one was found to have a full mutation. This is the only subject who may transmit the gene to the sixth generation. No protomutation carriers were found in the fourth and fifth generations. Therefore it is highly probable that the DM gene will be eliminated from this pedigree within one generation. The high population frequency of DM can at present not be explained by the contribution of asymptomatic cases in the younger generations of known families, but is probably caused by the events in the ancestral generations.. 

congenital disease
Decrease in GTP cyclohydrolase I gene expression caused by inactivation of one allele in hereditary progressive dystonia with marked diurnal fluctuation.
Hereditary progressive dystonia with marked diurnal fluctuation (HPD; dopa-responsive dystonia, DRD) have been recently found to be caused by a genetic defect in the GTP cyclohydrolase I (GCH1) gene. In this study, we quantified the mRNA level of GCH1 in phytohemagglutinin (PHA) -stimulated mononuclear blood cells from one Japanese family that do not have a mutation in the coding region or splice junctions of the gene. The results showed that the amounts of the GCH1 mRNA were decreased to about 40% of the normal level in both patients and carriers. In addition, we found that the GCH1 mRNA was transcribed from only one allele, indicating that the other allele was in an inactive state. These results suggest that some novel mutations should exist on one of the alleles in some unknown region of the GCH1 gene, and may decrease the GCH1 mRNA causing the HPD/DRD symptoms.. 

genetic defect
Loss-of-function mutations in the cathepsin C gene result in periodontal disease and palmoplantar keratosis.
Papillon-Lefevre syndrome, or keratosis palmoplantaris with periodontopathia (PLS, MIM 245000), is an autosomal recessive disorder that is mainly ascertained by dentists because of the severe periodontitis that afflicts patients. Both the deciduous and permanent dentitions are affected, resulting in premature tooth loss. Palmoplantar keratosis, varying from mild psoriasiform scaly skin to overt hyperkeratosis, typically develops within the first three years of life. Keratosis also affects other sites such as elbows and knees. Most PLS patients display both periodontitis and hyperkeratosis. Some patients have only palmoplantar keratosis or periodontitis, and in rare individuals the periodontitis is mild and of late onset. The PLS locus has been mapped to chromosome 11q14-q21 (refs 7, 8, 9). Using homozygosity mapping in eight small consanguineous families, we have narrowed the candidate region to a 1. 2-cM interval between D11S4082 and D11S931. The gene (CTSC) encoding the lysosomal protease cathepsin C (or dipeptidyl aminopeptidase I) lies within this interval. We defined the genomic structure of CTSC and found mutations in all eight families. In two of these families we used a functional assay to demonstrate an almost total loss of cathepsin C activity in PLS patients and reduced activity in obligate carriers. 

autosomal recessive disorder
Homozygous and heterozygous deletions of the von Willebrand factor gene in patients and carriers of severe von Willebrand disease.
Severe von Willebrand disease is characterized by undetectable or trace quantities of von Willebrand factor in plasma and tissue stores. We have studied the genomic DNA of 10 affected individuals from six families with this disorder using probes from the 5 and 3 ends of the vWF cDNA and with a probe extending from the 5 end into the central region. Southern blots of restriction endonuclease digests and gene dosage analysis measurements carried out with quantitative slot blots of undigested genomic DNA separated these patients into three groups. The first group consisted of a family with complete homozygous deletions of the vWF gene in the four probands. Gene dosage analysis was consistent with heterozygous deletions in both of the asymptomatic parents and four asymptomatic siblings of this kindred (P less than 0. 01). The second group was comprised of a family in which there was a complete heterozygous deletion of the vWF gene in the proband and one asymptomatic parent, suggesting that a different type of genetic abnormality was inherited from the other parent. Thus, the patient appeared to be doubly heterozygous for interacting genetic abnormalities affecting vWF expression. In the third group, no gene deletions could be detected. Alloantibodies developed only in the kindred with homozygous deletions. These techniques should prove useful in identifying carriers of severe von Willebrand disease and also in defining patients predictably at risk of developing alloantibodies to vWF. 

genetic abnormality
genetic abnormalities
Von Hippel-Lindau disease maps to the region of chromosome 3 associated with renal cell carcinoma.
Von Hippel-Lindau disease (VHL) is an autosomal dominant disorder with inherited susceptibility to various forms of cancer, including hemangioblastomas of the central nervous system, phaeochromocytomas, pancreatic malignancies, and renal cell carcinomas. Renal cell carcinomas constitute a particularly frequent cause of death in this disorder, occurring as bilateral and multifocal tumours, and presenting at an earlier age than in sporadic, non-familial cases of this tumour type. We report here that the VHL gene is linked to the locus encoding the human homologoue of the RAF1 oncogene, which maps to chromosome 3p25 (ref. 4). Crossovers with the VHL locus suggest that the defect responsible for the VHL phenotype is not a mutation in the RAF1 gene itself. An alternative or prior event to oncogene activation in tumour formation may be the inactivation of a putative tumour suppressor which can be associated with both the inherited and sporadic forms of the cancer. Sporadic renal cell carcinomas have previously been associated with the loss of regions on chromosome 3p (refs 5, 6). Consequently, sporadic and VHL-associated forms of renal cell carcinoma might both result from alterations causing loss of function of the same tumour suppressor gene on this chromosome.. 

autosomal dominant disorder
Abnormal development of Purkinje cells and lymphocytes in Atm mutant mice.
Motor incoordination, immune deficiencies, and an increased risk of cancer are the characteristic features of the hereditary disease ataxia-telangiectasia (A-T), which is caused by mutations in the ATM gene. Through gene targeting, we have generated a line of Atm mutant mice, Atm (y/y) mice. In contrast to other Atm mutant mice, Atm (y/y) mice show a lower incidence of thymic lymphoma and survive beyond a few months of age. Atm (y/y) mice exhibit deficits in motor learning indicative of cerebellar dysfunction. Even though we found no gross cerebellar degeneration in older Atm (y/y) animals, ectopic and abnormally differentiated Purkinje cells were apparent in mutant mice of all ages. These findings establish that some neuropathological abnormalities seen in A-T patients also are present in Atm mutant mice. In addition, we report a previously unrecognized effect of Atm deficiency on development or maintenance of CD4 (+) 8 (+) thymocytes. We discuss these findings in the context of the hypothesis that abnormal development of Purkinje cells and lymphocytes contributes to the pathogenesis of A-T.. 

hereditary disease
The molecular basis of Sjogren-Larsson syndrome: mutation analysis of the fatty aldehyde dehydrogenase gene.
Sjogren-Larsson syndrome (SLS) is an autosomal recessive disorder characterized by ichthyosis, mental retardation, spasticity, and deficient activity of fatty aldehyde dehydrogenase (FALDH). To define the molecular defects causing SLS, we performed mutation analysis of the FALDH gene in probands from 63 kindreds with SLS. Among these patients, 49 different mutations-including 10 deletions, 2 insertions, 22 amino acid substitutions, 3 nonsense mutations, 9 splice-site defects, and 3 complex mutations-were found. All of the patients with SLS were found to carry mutations. Nineteen of the missense mutations resulted in a severe reduction of FALDH enzyme catalytic activity when expressed in mammalian cells, but one mutation (798G-- > C [K266N]) seemed to have a greater effect on mRNA stability. The splice-site mutations led to exon skipping or utilization of cryptic acceptor-splice sites. Thirty-seven mutations were private, and 12 mutations were seen in two or more probands of European or Middle Eastern descent. Four single-nucleotide polymorphisms (SNPs) were found in the FALDH gene. At least four of the common mutations (551C-- > T, 682C-- > T, 733G-- > A, and 798 + 1delG) were associated with multiple SNP haplotypes, suggesting that these mutations originated independently on more than one occasion or were ancient SLS genes that had undergone intragenic recombination. Our results demonstrate that SLS is caused by a strikingly heterogeneous group of mutations in the FALDH gene and provide a framework for understanding the genetic basis of SLS and the development of DNA-based diagnostic tests.. 

autosomal recessive disorder
X-linked spastic paraplegia and Pelizaeus-Merzbacher disease are allelic disorders at the proteolipid protein locus.
Three forms of X-linked spastic paraplegia (SPG) have been defined. One locus (SPG 1) maps to Xq28 while two clinically distinct forms map to Xq22 (SPG2). A rare X-linked dysmyelinating disorder of the central nervous system, Pelizaeus-Merzbacher disease (PMD), has also been mapped to Xq21-q22, and is caused by mutations in the proteolipid protein gene (PLP) which encodes two myelin proteins, PLP and DM20. While narrowing the genetic interval containing SPG2 in a large pedigree, we found that PLP was the closest marker to the disease locus, implicating PLP as a possible candidate gene. We have found that a point mutation (His139Tyr) in exon 3B of an affected male produces a mutant PLP but a normal DM20, and segregates with the disease (Zmax = 6. 63, theta = 0. 00). It appears, therefore, that SPG2 and PMD are allelic disorders 

allelic disorders
allelic disorders